&gt;As far as I know they're the only company in this space.  Sounds like its time to make that two ..... 
Oh heck! So good
You can tell this is fake because we aren’t playing Florida State. /s
Not sure if this is the biggest set of rewards, but certainly a lot.. 10 rewards for a single mission.
Fun Fact, Michael A. Taylor attends the same school as my 12 year old son.
I feel like this is the 🔥 fire nation 🔥 😂 
They could be early concepts of any of the three Diamonds that aren't Pink.
While that sucks, there are comments here that provide good advise on how to consistently one-shot that -- heal and moar FS. If you have Clerics, that will help a ton as well for your OB. 
D
Thanks for these, I'll take a look after work =) 
 If you enjoy **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends**, it&amp;apos;s because you are weak, your bloodline is weak, and you will not survive the winter.  **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends**: kid-tested, mother-approved.  You people are sick! There&amp;apos;s /nothing/ funny about **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends**.  Qantas now prohibits **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends** on airplanes.  The Natural History Museum has just opened an interactive exhibit on **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends**.  **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends**? There&amp;apos;s an app for that.  When I am a billionare, I shall erect a 50-foot statue to commemorate **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends**.  The best part of waking up is **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends** in your cup!  That&amp;apos;s my secret, I&amp;apos;m always **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends**.  In the new DLC for Mass Effect, Shepard must save the galaxy from **Playing a fun game of "Mock the Retard" with your friends**.
For the safest wash trading to boost volume numbers!
Ngl I was terrified of growing breasts too. I’m comfortable with them now but I’ve ended up not quite binary female. 
And after about 3 of those, it stops asking. You're updating NOW, stop resisting or we'll install more versions of Candy Crush and turn telementry back on!
Following up on one question hanging in the air:  &gt;equation of tangent of circle is x.x1+y.y1=a²  *When does that work?*  ONLY for a circle centered at (0, 0) with radius a.  ONLY for finding a tangent line through a known of tangency (x1, y1) on the circle itself.  *Why does it work?*  Segment from center (0, 0) to known point (x1, y1) on circle has slope y1/x1.  Slope of the tangent line that contains (x1, y1) will be negative reciprocal, which is –x1/y1, because tangent is perpendicular to the radius.  Point (x1, y1) is on the tangent line and –x1/y1 is the slope. Use point-slope form.  y – y1 = –(x1/y1)(x – x1)  Multiply both sides by y1.  y.y1 – y1.y1 = –x.x1 + x1.x1  Rearrange terms.  x.x1 + y.y1 = x1.x1 + y1.y1  But x1^2 + y1^2 = a^2 because (x1, y1) is on the circle with radius a.  x.x1 + y.y1 = a^2  I repeat: That works only to find tangent to point (x1, y1) on a circle with radius a that has center (0, 0). It does not work for any problem where circle is not centered at (0, 0), and it does not work for any problem asking for equation of tangent line when point of tangency isn't given.
niiiice what an awesome gig!
beep, boop!  Here's a fun historical fact related to your post: Lupin was posthumously awarded the Order of Merlin, First Class, the first werewolf to ever receive this honor.
Interesting Vinland Saga Volumes, are these new bigger releases or just the american version?
*begins punching out those piano chords agressively on an out-of-tune piano*
Most definitely! I've already made peace with the song pre-flac but I'm enjoying it a bit more since I can clearly hear more.
Huh? She definitely has eyes..
Media Matters.  Why redact it?  They're a public figure.
Fuck Paul Ryan, that little P90X douche.
I saw a tweet suggesting the OIG report (emails, or #2) may be out next Tuesday
If I remember correctly, was that a chick with brown hair who has a crush on Jake Gyllenhaal's character?
wow...very nice 
There’s a master post somewhere on tumblr. I figure it was worth mentioning while I look for it Incase someone can find it faster than me.   Edit: I found it right away lol https://www.google.com/amp/s/advil.tumblr.com/post/95174471462/college-students-steal-your-textbooks-from-the/amp If none of those help try looking in the notes as well
Yeah, I’m not usually one to bitch, but that Veno and Necro...
I think you are missing the point - all of this noise over what must not be much.
I didn't even know that they started taking deposits already until I check the website due to post that Cavalry has reached 500 members 
Bubbles, Bubbles and Bubbles
It's over Farmer! Today is Wednesday!
 **Unfortunately, we've had to remove your post.** ___   ### Post Flair Guidelines  We require all users to set a post flair for their own post. There is a 30 minute grace period, and this has passed for this post.   Don't know how to flair your post? Click [here](http://imgur.com/a/m3FI3) to view this helpful guide on how to flair your post.   For more information, please read [this post](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortNiteBR/comments/8bznpy/state_of_the_subreddit_new_moderators_survey/).   ___ [**Here are our subreddit rules.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/FortNiteBR/wiki/rules) - If you have any queries about this, you can contact us via [Moderator Mail](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FFortNiteBR).
We should give up war and just make shrink rays. 
Trying to find a word I've heard a few times that seems to be the equivalent of the command "heel!", "calm!", or something similar to those words in the context of commanding a dog/animal (ex. you say strongly and loudly, while pointing at the dog, "stop!"). The word sounded like "haaus!" or  "はうす!".   Couldn't find anything on any online dictionaries, any help is appreciated!
Finished it and loved it too. I cannot wait for the third. Apparently it was all done but the publisher is going for annual releases. 
With thin enough skin, everything is offensive. 
These bots really get to the point these days.
cenobite
Why tanks 
Make her eat poop! 
I have a year left to go and sometimes I wonder if I should have just looked for jobs to build experience instead of going to college.
Minsan yung ayaw mag initiate ng breakup ang asshole. Yung wala ka ng feelings para sa SO mo tapos ayaw mo pang ikaw makipag break, siya nalang yung gumagawa ng paraan para sa relationship niyo tapos ikaw yung wala lang kasi ayaw mo na. Yung ginagago mo na lang siya para siya na lang yung makipagbreak.   Ako 'yon dati eh, tangina sinayang ko lang oras namen and lalo ko lang siyang nasaktan. Now I realize na napaka asshole nun and sometimes its better to just end it and save you both the time and more heartaches. 
54. For this we know that there is 66 calories in 15 tablespoons. If we try to find 5 grams, then we would simply divide 66 by 3. Then multiply by .59 since that is the percentage of fat and we get 12.98, which is 13. J
Who's Stanley?
Not trying to argue about it. That is one way, but I've gotten two pops that were Hot Topic exclusives from them, but I had to wait six months before they could sell and ship them to me. 6" Drogon and flocked Niffler.  They don't have the stickers, but I wanted the pops, so I didn't care that much. I'm assuming the same will go for the Deadpool pop.
FINDING IT HARD TO GIVE A FUCK ABOUT TONIGHT, BECAUSE CARLTON FANS CERTAINLY DON'T SEEM TO WANT TO.  DOESN'T MATTER, I'M STILL GETTING MILEAGE WITH PAYING MY HAWKS WORKMATE ALL KINDS OF JOKES ABOUT RONKE AND THE NUMBER 7.  I'M A BIT LIKE A SPASTIC VERSION OF THE COUNT FROM SESAME STREET AT THIS POINT.
I live. My wife's from here, and I work from home, doing freelance stuff. Was in a band for a while, we even got paid to play, so I was a semi-pro musician for a short time, too. It was fun, but we got a kid, so I had to cut short on touring time, left the band.  Not all foreigners in China are expats, living in a foreign bubble, and between the wife's family and friends and the local friends I made, social life is pretty much as active as back home. Kid's growing up, taking quite a big chunk of my time, and I wonder when I'll be able to get back to playing music with said friends, but on the whole, life's not bad.   I do miss cheese and not overpriced palatable beer, though. But the local fare is very good, too, even if I grow bored of rice from time to time.  I guess you could say I came for the girl and stayed for the food?
Like I want to just go back to being the me that feels comfortable but everyone thinks I’m standoffish or picky! This is just so frustrating lol And when it comes to work I have no clue what to do -_- 
What's it called? Is it Paws Humane lol. 
Besides what's already been said, it shows he has a 1960s/1970s understanding of the manufacturing economy.
Yes I agree! I hate when intergalactic or international anime act like everyone speaks the same language, and I thought the immersion in the first episode was great!
Our Prime Minister isn't, but he's really good at pretending to be.
Big bamboozle
My understanding is that the BOT is selling it, not a player. Those coins go straight to EA. Sellers would be lucky to be getting 240k.
Man, that's so 80s I can smell the Old Spice cologne. 
WHY!?? Why is your MIL stealing your undies? Has she done this before?
To tell people to watch out for sketchy posts on a gun subreddit?
&gt; and a giant leap of 10 years in 2013)   Average car age got 10 years older in 1 year?  or am I reading it wrong?
It is more or less a boilerplate with framework characteristics. Boilerplate usually just take a thin layer of prepared code for you with some best practices, this though gives you a convention that is flexible with simple configurations.  there is no common ground with flask\-restful to compare them to each other, here we have a built\-in multi ORM support \(SQLAlchemy \+ sqlalchemy\-mixins included, Orator, Pony\), DB migrations, although there are a lot need to be redesigned, and I'm working on it, for example migration for different ORMs still being executed using the same command, I have to separate them.  Thanks for your suggestion.
Pekka has pink horns and mini pekka has blue horns.
Yep OpTic surprised me how dominant they were, and it was great to watch. However we must remember it was only 1 league match, and not get ahead of ourselves. Feel sorry for Formal after everything he has done for OpTic, and I am sure he will turn things round. It is such a shame that old OpTic did not go their separate ways on better terms. Great performances from everyone on OpTic ,and hopefully this is the start of another successful journey .
I like more basic sets. I prefer that to the overly flashy bullshit.  Btw, the PA is I think a vampire count set repurposed to this....the Necro on screams grey seer.......  I like the pango one..thats what I think sets should be like more than the overly flashy, particle vomit we've been getting.  Different people have different tastes.  Its pretty sad that you think your aesthetic opinion is the only "legitmate" view on the matter. 
These stereotypes cut too close to the bone :(  I'm going to listen to some dank dub beats and pack my vape
The NDP have real solid plans to support rural and northern communities. Building a road to the Ring of Fire in the north to support resource development and create local jobs. Bringing broad band support to rural and northern communities. Improving rail infrastructure in northern communities. Promoting smelting activities in Sudbury.   I know some people paint supporting unions as a negative thing but they’re so important, unions are the ones who fought for and got everyone labour rights. Union jobs are what supported my family growing up. Most of my family is or has been part of a union at some point and I don’t know that we would have been able to have a middle class life otherwise. Unions cover such a large portion of the population that they really just represent the regular working person.   The NDP have solid plans for pharmacare which might sound expensive but when we, the people of Ontario, are a single bargaining unit we can achieve better deals across the board from drug companies on prescription costs.   I could go on but there’s a lot of reasons why te NDP are a good choice and not just a protest vote. I’m clearly biased form the amount of info I have about the NDP but I have read the PC and liberal plans as well. As an NDP voter I actually supported the potential government of Patrick Brown (or even Christine Elliot) and could see myself being convinced to be a moderate PC voter but Doug Ford is not a competent politician and not a good representative for the PC brand. 
Is the child American?
Ma Man... are you on PC? Do you know if a Striker Skyblue / BS exists? I need them to finish my set
I need to see Logan's run from the beginning.  It's a cult hit.  I only watched a bit of it one night thinking, "WTF am I watching?"
Sam was with the blonde ice was with the ginger and dank was with the fat girl there is a clip somewhere on this reddit look down the reddit from like an hour or two ago it was on danks stream
First line to pride and prejudice, right? The older I get, the more I think of this quote.
is it small
Okay I'm sorry, but... this is so untrue, it's insane. I'm anti-SJW as all hell but this edit is such bullshit.  Feminine behavior is not encouraged in males at all. Many of us get rejected and disowned by our peers and families for being LGBT or not being "masculine". Why are butch women treated better by society than femme men?  I wish it was even accepted- take back all the years of bullying and rejection I've faced.   I love this sub but, unless this is a very new thing, this couldn't be more false. And I'm 25, not that old. 
1560
Then deal with it
Quite cute!
Maybe she meant the original Thanos... where it makes her feel more like a nihilistic titan with a heavy fascination for death?
"How dare people have fun in their own way! They should only do what I want them too!"
Not trying to be funny but I didn't know he died that really just saddened me 
Looks like they post the same thing every month.
Lol I meant why did you hide your stuff in the caves if you can only see them when you move the rocks?
Cut a hole in my dance'n'flex barbie in her crotch. Colored a patch of pubes with a sharpie. Used a rubber band to attach a small screw to the front of a ken doll, and made them mate for our entertainment
I’m hoping to see that Matt Damon guy make it big in Hollywood. 
Man...I’m liking the way this is going.
I'm loving the ping/lag bar and getting compensated for using lower rated fighters. They killed the 1-2 spam and buffed the ground game. I'm pretty happy so far. 
CAUSE ITS ALL LOVE! LOVE EVERYBODY!!!! 
I had both, I preferred my AirPods because of the way they work with the case (essentially always having a full charge every time I take them out, taking them out of the case turns them on automatically, etc.)
**Exchange Additions From The Last 12 Hours**  Coin|Exchange -|- BOE|gate.io JOT|hitbtc LYM|bitfinex VEE|bitfinex DAD|bitfinex UTK|bitfinex JBC|hitbtc USD|bittrex   Coin|Market|Exchange -|-|- BOE|USDT|gate.io BOE|ETH|gate.io JOT|BTC|hitbtc BTC|CNYT|exx ETH|CNYT|exx VEE|USD|bitfinex LYM|ETH|bitfinex UTK|ETH|bitfinex DAD|ETH|bitfinex VEE|BTC|bitfinex DAD|USD|bitfinex UTK|BTC|bitfinex LYM|BTC|bitfinex UTK|USD|bitfinex LYM|USD|bitfinex DAD|BTC|bitfinex VEE|ETH|bitfinex JBC|ETH|hitbtc JBC|BTC|hitbtc   **For Live Updates Checkout [ExchangeScanner](https://ExchangeScanner.com)** **For Project Updates Follow Us On Twitter [@ExchangeScanner](https://twitter.com/exchangescanner)**
It's from an old saying, "why buy the cow when you're getting the milk for free?" It's from the mindset of a woman who wants to get married. The logic is that if she has sex with her man, he will be less likely to want to marry her, because he's already getting the thing he wants. 
The album is called "to pimp a butterfly" not "to pimp a pigeon" jesus guy
I adore Claymore, thank you. 
Ive never seen an actual vault dweller before. Thought theyd be taller
This is a terrible angle. Stuff is in the way of you're in the middle of the shot, you have windows behind you and 7 feet is too far away. There must be a better way.
No, I enjoy eating meat and also am an apprentice butcher, so it's kinda opposite to what my beliefs of consumption are.  However, I am very interested in the developments occuring with lab grown meat, and look forward to how it's quality will be once it's available for public consumption.
I wouldn't be surprised if that actually happened.
Yes, vacations are great for renewing energy! Looks like you did pretty well overall, but I hope June is even better for you!
Hmm it’s not that ugly, but if I was going to buy a bolt action it wouldn’t be that one. They have some other good options. I still have my AR and can’t waste money on buying a bolt action yet lol. 
Straight stitch will work fine but if it's a loose weave, you might want to do two lines of stitching close together. Good Luck!
Can I see Caveira's?
I’ve got the latest. I tricked it by setting my calendar back haha. Couldn’t believe it worked.
They are stupid looking. But I figured I could resell mine.
&gt;My bet is she isn't catholic.  And if she is Catholic just read about the [Misserere](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Miserere_(Allegri\)):  * Composed around 1638, Miserere was the last and most famous of twelve falsobordone settings used at the Sistine Chapel since 1514. At some point, it became forbidden to transcribe the music and it was allowed to be performed only at those particular services at the Sistine Chapel, thus adding to the mystery surrounding it.  * According to the popular story (backed up by family letters), fourteen-year-old Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart was visiting Rome when he first heard the piece during the Wednesday service. Later that day, he wrote it down entirely from memory, returning to the Chapel that Friday to make minor corrections. Less than three months after hearing the song and transcribing it, Mozart had gained fame for the work and was summoned to Rome by Pope Clement XIV, who showered praise on him for his feat of musical genius and awarded him the Chivalric Order of the Golden Spur on July 4, 1770.  So unauthorized copying of a protected work was not only tolerated by but applauded by the Pope.
No keep wv away from my homeland
I ask myself multiple times a year if I believe that humans are inherently good or inherently evil.   I still think humans are inherently good, but circumstance drives us the other way...
Haha no. Just brush her regularly.
Good fucking lord, Call to Arms is so damn good I got teary eyed purely out of joy, the first time I heard it.
In the cases of things like fetal alcohol syndrome, which is entirely preventible and a well understood risk, I can't see how anyone can argue that the mother should not be held responsible.   Addiction is no excuse.  If you drive a car drunk and seriously injure a passenger in the back seat, you still get into trouble and are held responsible, no matter if you're an addict.  Why should it be any different for an internal passenger if you will?  Perhaps a good solution is that once the baby is born, the mother can be aborted.
Well then, ya learn something new every day. That's what a canadian friend of mine has told me on more than a few occasions, but a precursory google search does back you up. 
2 has more of a stern fatherly thing going on than one.
vegan junk food is life! not every day life, but I will eat the fuck out of a vegan jalapeno mack and cheese burger while eating kale and tofu every other day. I don't think anyone is eating this stuff exclusively the way raw or HCLF people are. 
Thank you! So glad you follow me! 
It worked for me,  I used a chocolate hab sauce every day for a month and I've not had the issue again.
Hype, 5AM in toronto, 6 pm in New York, Stay Schemin, Say Whats Real, Dreams Money Can Buy, 30 for 30, Draft Day, 0 to 100, Worst Behavior, BtB,  4 pm Calabasas, Know Yourself, Pound Cake, Do Not Disturb, 
No you 
Kombucha
^  Just thought I‘d add two things to your comment:  OP might be losing 6dB and won’t have the benefit of a balanced connection (for the obvious reason of only transferring 1 signal)
No I have not.
They aren't.
/r/birdpics
bloodthinner didn't post the idea completely.  CDC recommends the simple exam mask for basic care of a flu patient, but then recommends the N95 or better for any activity that bodily fluids can become aerosolized.  Large droplet protection is all that is required for most interactions, but increased protection for particulate and aerosolization precautions when necessary. 
Try one of their mock tests. When you get more than 70%, you're probably ready, except maybe for the parts you can't really test without feedback like conversations or writing a text.  You could post your text here to get feedback.  The speaking part is very basic: [http://bfu.goethe.de/a1_sd1/sprechen.php](http://bfu.goethe.de/a1_sd1/sprechen.php). First you have to introduce yourself according to the key words ("Ich heiße ... Ich komme aus..."), then you have to ask for or give informations based on key words (e.g. "Frühstück" -&gt; "Isst du Frühstück?" -&gt; "Ja.") and then say something or react to someone based on pictures (e.g. CD -&gt; "Wo ist die CD?" -&gt; "Zu Hause.")  When people are able to understand you, because they *really* want to understand you, you're fine. So making lots and lots of insignificant mistakes or having a really strong accent might not be a big problem.
I didn't present them cause it wasn't the point of the discussion. Im just saying that you cant vote based on personality traits. Especially when it doesn't show up in their platform.  If want to have a *political* discussion, we can have one.  I for one don't agree with NDP policies at all and I'm curious has to why people think they're better than the PC's. For starters I think not taxing minimum wage workers is probably smart, I think i can see where hes trying to go with this.  1. I think its going to improve economy even if its by a little bit. \(With things like spending on products and services and moving cash in the country\). 2. Students are able to keep more money to pay back student loans a little bit quicker, an extra 500\-800 dollars is a 1/3 of a college semester so that might help give some leverage with paying back student debt. 3. It allows a poorer families with minimum wage jobs to help pay for food, rent, etc.  I also think scrapping carbon tax is ultimately good. I don't think we can force green innovation by throwing a ton of our money at it. It seems like its better if we encourage companies to foot the green innovation by minimizing the regulation and encourage companies to innovate themselves as they are the suppliers of all things that emit carbon. They hold a ton of the technology that helps run things more efficiently and more green.   Reducing small business tax is HUGE. People like Walmart destroy local competition and this would provide an amazing edge to startups and local mom and pop shops and the like. It would create a more competitive and healthier economy.   As far as I'm concerned, hes not being transparent on the budget, which is severely hurting his image. It sucks that the OPC chose Doug. However i don't think we should undermine the entire PC party for that. I think they will not do as bad as everyone says they will.  Now on the NDP side of things,   She promised global health care, which is one of the biggest destroyer of economies and the biggest contributors to debt. I am all for giving Ontario free health care, however its a little silly that anyone can just come through the border and receive treatment for no cost. Medical isn't cheap and it shows in our national debt. If you look at the debt before Pierre Trudeau took power and the debt 20 years later. Its essentially a slope way upwards. Which is the cost of keeping people alive. Don't get me wrong i think its amazing that we have healthcare for our citizens and I like the system as it is. However if we release it to the entire world to get free treatment. Its going to hurt us big time.   That being said I don't like PC's position on privatizing it. However they weren't transparent on that either. So I can't comment too much on that.   Package all of that and the huge game with identity politics. I don't think anyone is stupid for picking PC as a potential candidate to take over.   
Would it be more work/money than putting in a big window?
The last startup I worked at would drool at the prospects of hiring someone from the Big-N, and I kept hearing "we got someone from the Big-N!" during job interviews.  But yeah, good luck with your hunt, and I hope you will be happier
NIMMO IS THE SPARK   THAT WILL LIGHT THE FIRE   THAT WILL BURN THE CUBS DOWN! 
Are you sure this is a V3, the dial looks like the one used in the V2 which had a more sunburst effect. The V3 had more of a matte finish.
Yes, dems should use every dirty trick imaginable to make sure that Republicans have as little political power as constitutionally possible
Gimme a whiskey sour any day. I like it about half/half.
As a Sonic fan this stings...
Not your fault, it's the game's fault. The new patch that was supposed to "help" lower-end pc owners just made the game even laggier. I sure hope they fix this
My thoughts exactly!
#Safety Warning:  **Sites below can potentially have multiple ads, and/or popups, and/or misleading download links.**  * Always remember to never download anything from the websites posted here.  * Use an **AdBlocker** - I recommend using uBlock Origin.  * Report any other suspicious links to the moderators and be sure to include a reason why.  * Use these sites with your own discretion.  *****  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/nbastreams) if you have any questions or concerns.*
How?
So this is your typical you ignored the vulnerability so I'll expose it hack.
The Gus character is modeled on Sidney Crosby. That's why he's such an insufferable twat.
Same here, and what inheritance ? 
My favorite stupid running gag on the show, and nobody else seems to appreciate it...
Nvm just read the comment below lol.
I could think of a couple for many fan bases  Buffalo- Hull’s skate was in crease  Boston- Matt Cooke hit Marc Savard  Colorado- Todd Bertuzzi assault Steve Moore  Chicago- 0 in 49   Calgary- we have no goal  Montreal- 1993 was two decades ago  Toronto- A lead in Game 7  Philly- Crosby owns your team  Rangers- Lundqvist won’t win a cup  Washington- Vegas will win  Vancouver- Boston has won the Cup  Edit  For Nashville - after review no goal 
Cuz he was asked/paid to???
wtf.  &gt;[A further inspiration](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Home_(The_X-Files)#Writing) came from a story in Charlie Chaplin's autobiography; while touring with a British musical theatre, he stayed at a tenement home. After dinner, the family took him upstairs to meet their son, pulling him out from under a bed. The son \("a half man with no legs, an oversized, blond, flat\-shaped head, a sickening white face, a sunken nose, a large mouth," according to Chaplin\) "flopp\[ed\] around" while they sang and danced.
That's true for all crypto, but for ethereum you have to account there's a certain % of those are contract. Anyway more addr used = the use on the network is growing which is good.. 
I think maybe just have it come cumulatively as opposed to set damage ticks that other players get. Instead of regular storm damage at all stages the damage could slowly build up, from 1-1-2-2-3-3 etc per tick. Maybe also have a movement speed buff in the storm to make up for this nerf.
u/calvinhobbesliker, When I ordered the 'All shipped' appeared 10h30 later, so I guess for you it'll be today  I think 'On the way' is more making it enter the postal service(?) since it's already been packaged
I suppose all the Google Hangout debates Live-streamed on YouTube which remain archived never occurred.   Let me guess, you’ll call me names but not step up to the plate. Same invitation for you. 
Would be way too OP
&gt;  PM is doing great IMO. So much so I'm freeing up some cash to buy more next week. And I think I might vote for the share authorization.  oz, still trying to get up after falling off his recliner! :)
I’ve seen Florence five times and every time I wonder why I even bother going to see other artists. She’s so amazing.
I've been the main breadwinner in my relationship for a few years while my partner has been working through some serious mental health problems. I've also put a lot of emotional labor into helping him. He shows his appreciation not only by taking my own anxiety seriously and helping me when I need it, but literally just thanking me. Sometimes he gives a very serious "thank you, I appreciate you so much", and it really helps me. He also got me a nice card out of the blue once with an inside joke on it :) 
Yeah it's weird, we don't even know if he carries it around like Sasuke does.
I like you 
Cute couple. Glad WoW brought you two together.
You clearly know nothing about diversifying revenue streams and investment 
THAT is awesome.  DGX kicks are, but they just took it to another level.
For those interested in the official (deleted) apology the store sent out  https://web.archive.org/web/20180529123148/https://m.facebook.com/backtoedenbakery/posts/10156247917969043  I can see why she felt discrimination, given the restaurant still had a line and was full of people finishing their food. Though I still think it was stupid to fire the employees over a misunderstanding like this.
🤤
That article title reads like a mad lib.
Who. Cares.
Montezuma shows up with 5 Eagle Warriors on turn 18.
He posted yesterday in the Layoffs thread, Can go read his post there.
You can find the instructions at [https://github.com/devkitPro/pacman/releases/tag/devkitpro\-pacman\-1.0.1](https://github.com/devkitPro/pacman/releases/tag/devkitpro-pacman-1.0.1)
+1 for picks matter. I keep about four different sizes and weights in my gig bag because they all have different attack, tone, and feel. Including felt picks, which I absolutely love. 
Lol I like how you compare gendercritical (a sub that doesn't "call for men's balls to be chopped off", but criticizes systematic oppression) to incels that want to legally rape women. Men literally killing and raping women is barely called what it is (a hate crime against women and a symptom of the society we live in) but women who point it out are basically nazis. It's the sex version of r/vegan. 
Oh fuck off 
You sure he hasn’t imprinted on you?  You’re the momma.   Open the door and let him in .
Dialects of living languages have to be constantly diverging almost by definition -- it's one of the effects of the language being in constant, daily use, and being learned from the cradle. When a language becomes increasingly fixed, less commonly used, and stops being learned from the cradle, it dies.  There are arguments about communications technologies viz. language, but I think what some of these arguments miss is that these technologies change the *rate* of language divergence -- not the underlying processes of divergence itself -- by providing a sort of reference standard that is a bit more fixed than the way the local aristocrats (or equivalent) talk.   Languages with extensive written traditions, for example, especially in a manner where the writing reflects the phonology, tend to diverge much more slowly than fully oral languages -- but it's *also* true that in many examples of languages with extensive written traditions (like Latin), the written standard is wholly reflective of the prestige register and can often mask or obfuscate changes in colloquial speech over time.  More questions come about now because with modern recording technology, we can preserve ways people *talk* that was simply never available until the 20th century. But even then, consider that the prestige register of [Mid-Atlantic English](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mid-Atlantic_accent), which was popular among the pre-jet age equivalent of jet-setters, is now basically dead.
Did you fix the trap challenge?!?!
Ah ok, thanks. 
&gt;My desire is to discover the secret to the mystery.   Presumably if your gripe in this very context is not being pulled in after one page, there's more pleasure to be had in reading than revealing mystery. You can't divorce the sense of being "compelled" by a story from gratification. Which is why I said your statement is disingenuous.   One could allude to a musician toiling away at producing an album. In one instance there's gratification in having completed the project. Playing music is in and of itself gratifying, however - some will describe it as not being a job at all, for that reason. There's perpetual moments of gratification alongside delayed gratification (for mystery, in your case). 
I love how his voice changes when he plays with a girl OMEGALOL
You can find cat grass at pet shops, grocery stores,  and gardening places for your kitty to actually be able to snack on :)
I've seen white and red on the paratroopers but as far as I know blue military face paint has never existed since blue is a highly visible color.
It's not just gaming either.  I remember people bitching and moaning about Jason Momoa being cast as the new Conan the Barbarian and Aquaman because he wasn't white enough.  Personally I think Jason Momoa was fucking awesome as Conan and would have loved to have seen an entire television series of it.  I can't comment on Aquaman though as I've got superhero movie fatigue and haven't watched any of that shit since Ironman 2.
Mod it. Fallout 76 Elder Scrolls 6 Conversion mod.
Oh, so you claim you've improved it all and then you back out. Idiots, it's like driving the wrong way. 
I'm going to say it: Bunyan has really nice legs. You wouldn't normally expect that for a lumberjack.
How did we get so lucky to get Nimmo?
Youth policy. He's playing okay a VFL but I think the writing is on the wall. It's a shame because in the short term I think his presence would help us win games but probably hold back Timmy O and guys like Mitch Lewis.... Shoey is one of my favourites and I hope he gets a few more games...
is there a name for this angle?
one of my fav fighters
A Canuck Navy Reservist living in Southern Ontario?  Good!  Those Ohioans on the other side of the lake can get unruly at times, best to have some men at the ready.  Oh, and if you need ideas on how to invade Ohio, just watch the big D-Day reenactment that takes place in Conneaught, to the east of Cleveland. Just leave the surrounding states out of it and you'll be good.  Bonus points if you take out a few Ohio Big 10 sports teams while you're at it.
Maybe talk to her about it, give her a warning aboit how this will go down if she doesnt change. 
This is already decoded, and information is available in the wiki [here](https://minecraft.gamepedia.com/Enchantment_Table#Standard_Galactic_Alphabet).  The words that show up in the enchantment table selection are chosen at random from the list and have absolutely no bearing on the type of enchantment(s) that will be given by the choice.  Edit:  The file name that stores the characters is assets/minecraft/textures/font/ascii_sga.png if you feel like extracting and modifying it and replacing them with regular characters.  I'm not aware offhand of any resource packs that do this, but it's not difficult to make.
I totally agree. Ears folded back, looking down. Probably the best trained dog of the bunch, it’s the only one NOT doing what it wants. 
white zombas still expensive same with octane. heats are up, chameleon is like bubbly? i think?
This mall gets pretty quiet beyond the Target wing. I also found the former JCPenney opening: https://www.flickr.com/photos/jjbers/24250273788/in/album-72157687879397131/
This post was removed because it is not from the [approved domains](/r/nsfw/wiki/hosts) or it is not a direct image link. Please read the link on proper way to post. Please note that albums are not allowed to be posted by new accounts. Also note that new users using imgur need to link directly to the image (i.imgur.com/abcdefg.png) not the html page (imgur.com/abcdefg).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/petite) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Harmon Kardon, those things have a true hipster shape: https://c.76.my/Malaysia/harman-kardon-soho-wireless-premium-ear-headphones-cmnmobile-1508-02-cmnmobile@6.jpg
KMF
hello there
Yes I vape  V Always  A Upvote  P Black  E Cats
D
To be honest OP, I'm not sure what was up with your parents but high risk pregnancies involving hospitalisation implies accidental pregnancy - especially if your younger siblings are only a year apart.  Either that or do your parents come from a religious sect that frowns on contraception or were any of your younger siblings twins? Cause high risk pregnancies usually means the doctors don't recommend subsequent pregnancies (and certainly would be pulling in the mother the moment she fell pregnant again).  In any case, your dad shouldn't be shoving responsibility on you to support your family.  But I think he's probably scared and trying to make himself feel better that even though he's basically failed at making sure his children will be okay, that you'll be there. This is very unfair on you.  You're only in your mid twenties, and you should never have been made to bring up kids when you were still a kid yourself.  But - unless you want to cut off your dying father, your mother and your four younger siblings, it is what it is.  Maybe your mother can be encouraged to go back to work once your younger siblings are old enough not to require as much supervision.  And hopefully your father has a peaceful death.  Your siblings will grow up and with your encouragement and help, they'll know how to save money and live a better life so they don't need to lean on you financially. I guess what I'm saying is that you're in a catch 22 - you can't take back your lost childhood, and you can't drop the responsibility of financially supporting your family without losing your family.  But at least it isn't forever.  Your younger siblings will graduate from school and will learn to support themselves (you should have a talk with them soon though about how much you can provide for their college educations so they can be ready to get scholarships and loans like you did) - and you can help your mother be better prepared for retirement than she is at the moment. With regards to your boyfriend though... Do you love your family? Does he know this? Cause if he does, him saying you should stop helping them is sort of sociopathic.  It feels a bit odd that this guy has been dating you this long and be completely uncaring about your family.   Anyway, if he wants to resign and invest his savings then he can - but he has to do it on his dime.  That means he should have enough savings to keep paying his share of the rent, the utilities, the food and luxuries bill while he plays around with his savings.  That's how it works when you start playing with becoming independently wealthy with savings.  Also, as much as being in a relationship means supporting your partner - that doesn't mean sacrificing your financial stability and happiness so they can freeload.  If he wants to do this and you agree to basically being his financial safety net while he screws around, then there has to be rules in place.  Stuff like "how much money do you need to be able to generate to do this for longer than [x] period of time" and "what constitutes enough money to not work" and "when do you go back to work".  Though to be honest, OP, I'd have dumped him when he was saying I should cut off my parents and younger siblings (who are all 13 and younger?) who were more or less dependent on my earning capacity to stay above the poverty line.  It's just so ... coldly sociopathic.
Can confirm, so damn good!
I could have sworn it was a Jamaican accent. Interesting thought about it. Not sure I subscribe. This is more of fan theory?
Did you forget when the idea of teaching Ebonics in schools was popular for a minute? We're getting there.
I thought this America
Masturbation Mesa would be a better name.
I’m in the same place. While I am clearly and openly at odds with the teachings I haven’t cut the final cord because my parents watch my kids. But I can say that my youngest starts Kindergarten this year and I am getting a pretty big promotion. As soon as I can afford before/after care or a Nanny for after school I’m doing it. I need to feel and know that part of my life is behind me. But I will loose almost all of my family. It’s hard. 
Ehhhhh!! Me too! Except mine was used and 2007. Oh my lanta...is there a night and day difference in feel. Positive of course. I agree with the sounds, definitely could use more bass. Looking to add a powered truck sub in the back or a custom corner enclosure very soon.   If you ever get speaker door rattle like I did for my front passenger side; my dealership wouldn't fix anything. They just said that's normal for high bass range in music. I took the door panel off and added foam strips and solved it myself. 
Spiteful, and vindictive. Every argument is ad hominem. Facts are irrelevant in any debate because they may infringe on the current accepted trends. Don't waste your time with them ever.
no one brings gany to tank perna
All apologies /u/WaffleMans0-0 but your post has been automatically removed because the artist has too many youtube plays. The maximum is 500000, this link has 7217651.   If you think this is in error, please [contact the mods](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=/r/listentothis&amp;subject=Post+removed+in+error.&amp;message=https://redd.it/8nnc3n. If you're new to the subreddit, please read the [full list of removal reasons](https://www.reddit.com/r/listentothis/wiki/removalreasons).   Don't blame me, [I'm just a bot](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ljnT49jU9vM).
Thanks will do
Who gives a fuck?  I don’t work in residential but if I had clients wanting to pay a premium for what would normally be a standard item I would gladly install it. 
That's a tax writeoff lol
I feel as if the term "religious freedom" is a bit nebulous in this scenario.  When you say this, do you mean it in the sense that people should be free to worship without any restraint?  One concept that I actually really like comes from the Islamic Middle Ages. Perhaps you've heard of it, but Islamic states instituted a system in which *dhimmi* or "people of the book", who were practitioners of religions related to Islam (most notably Christianity and Judaism), were permitted to practice their faith so long as they submitted to the Islamic authorities, notably through a religious tax system.  I think that this sort of system provides the best balance between "free" practice of religion and maintaining the dominance of the state religion.
3.1x larger (1920x1080) version of linked image:  https://www.gannett-cdn.com/media/2018/05/29/Salem/Salem/636632088859707480-Skyler-Kelemen-2-AD-05-31-18-SN7774.jpg  *****  ^[source&amp;nbsp;code](https://github.com/qsniyg/maxurl)&amp;nbsp;|&amp;nbsp;[website](https://qsniyg.github.io/maxurl/)&amp;nbsp;/&amp;nbsp;[userscript](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/36662-image-max-url)&amp;nbsp;(finds&amp;nbsp;larger&amp;nbsp;images)&amp;nbsp;|&amp;nbsp;[remove](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=MaxImageBot&amp;subject=delete:+dzwsof4&amp;message=delete)
Yep. Dealt with this way too much. Caught a 3 year old girl chugging it because she "didn't want me to hit her" that's when I realized the little girl drugs herself because of she was awake her mom's new boyfriend would beat her for making noise.  Called 911 for potential poisoning.  Mom showed up screaming that the child knows how much to take.  It was surre
Bailiff ... poke the judge. ^(with a stick)
Which 4 are the bad ones?
U wat m8?
Well it's not law yet. I thought it was because the bill was proposed in 2015 and usually it doesn't take 3 years for a bill to become law. Anyways go read on Bill C\-51 national post has an article about it.
Username checks out
Nope, the FIRST time you get the quest its all 3 waves  when it repeats, its just one wave
Where did ya get that cool nose? :-D
That's brutal. I think most brokers sell on multiple exchanges so I don't think you're locked into BMO. I know that people on this sub love questtrade but I'm not sure how their customer is. 
To be fair, Real Madrid last couple seasons have just been crossing the ball.. Not exactly brilliant football either. Also wasn't a big fan of our midfield having trouble getting to our forwards properly against Bayern and Liverpool. As soon as teams pressure hard we just keep passing it backward.
Bruce Arthur (Toronto Media, very tied in with Raptors been on several Lowe pods) said Colangelo is done: https://twitter.com/bruce_arthur/status/1002338180497068033
Then how are you hoping to find out if she's fooling around since this is your only evidence? 
Damn as a Philly nativa I say “wudda ice”😂😂
Blasphemy
If you do, invest in a serial port adapter that will reliably use the same comm port. Some can change and cause havoc until someone reconfigures the software.
AYY PALM SPRINGS BAYBEE
*party’s
He’s cut
Got 2 Crazy_Cray
I have noticed more frequent DCs and crashes since Summerset.
Was around 400th in rank. Woke up to 6000th. x.x
Might not have aired yet 
Better off sitting that trash bag. 
Good call! Yeah now the FHA PMI IS FOREVERRRRRRRRRRR to me that’s insane. Fucking insane! I see people jumping into it without knowing or thinking long term and getting screwed out of so much money.   Or they only want the house for a few years and want to refinance or move to a bigger house.   Our initial plan was to buy stay for five years move. Now with the market coming back we’re probably gonna stay here. But that could change who knows! 
I expect nothing less than dire physical consequences.
[Here you go](https://github.com/clevett/cr5ashland). This is some pretty ugly code but hopefully it will help you with your play test. :)
Stay awhile and listen.
I’d also like to know!
This is an amazing overpowered cosplay and I am so here for it  👍 good on him Fallout is an amazing franchise and he looks like he spent a lot of time on that
Kershaw's mechanics look weirdly off. And velo down across the board. As a Dodger fan, this literally makes me wanna cry. 
Fuel economy/emissions. I don't think the tune is CARB compliant. 
Both, he referred to sexually abusing children as “mega lolz”
A Witch Hunter and a Witch Elf?  Talk about odd couples...
Quake is even more impressive to watch.
I'd go Tim Smith over Rocky. Rocky is a bit risky still and Smith looks like a great cash cow. Rocky's BE is around 70 so if he has another great game he should stay under 600k and be great value. 
Appreciate the explanation, thaks!
i might try thanks 
&gt;An optimistic hero's journey character people looked up to and admired  That journey doesn't end at the age of twenty-three. When we last left him in *ROTJ*, he'd barely started.  &gt;its like if you make a Harry Potter sequel and he's 60 and into cocaine for trying to murder Ron's kids  Uh, *The Cursed Child*, anyone?  &gt;Kids don't want to grow up to be luke anymore  No, they want to grow up to be Rey, Finn, and Poe. Same as kids watching the OT wanted to be Luke rather than the crusty old mentor who was getting too old for that shit. Luke isn't OT Luke, he's OT Obi-Wan.  &gt;Can we move the story forward FFS  Hence getting the legacy characters out of the way to *actually* move the story forward onto the new generation, as it's supposed to be.
&gt; non-macro background persons have said those things, but I’ve never heard a macro person NOT say that.  I'll be totally honest, I'm a pretty big craft beer nerd, but I've had WAY more bad beers from small craft breweries that should have legitimately been thrown out than those from macros (smaller sample size, to be sure, but the only poorly brewed beer that comes to mind is the infected Bourbon County variants that should never have made it out of the barrel warehouse).
Sorry, only have the things mentioned in the post. Good luck. 
If anybody in MI has an mn12 tbird they don't want anymore send a message my way
Interesting, I’ll have to look into it.
Company is building a new, larger, server room. This is gonna fuck us over too, especially since servers and racks were made from aluminum and steel.
kinda cool imo
It looks like he has a few extra chromosomes 
tune in to find out!
Don't worry. I got the Airplane reference! you get an upvote!
I trust that I could look over the lamp away from this four-year-old drama. As I drove home to my friend's subtle powers of reasoning and extraordinary energy in action that I found the summer sun shining into the long lash which we had just left. Turning round we saw a little blonde woman stood in one of the upper part of his assurance while Holmes fell upon his aristocratic features.
You are forgetting the ionic magnesium and the other trace minerals.
There are quite a few microbreweries in Saskatoon right now.  Downtown, there is 9mile Legacy, 21st Street Brewery (lower level of Winston's pub), and Saskatoon Brewery (located behind Earl's pub).  On the north end of the city, there is Prairie Sun and High Key Brewery.  On the east end, there is The Thirsty Scholar and Paddock Wood (which only does bottle sales and growler fills).  The Woods alehouse also carries a number of beers from various breweries across Saskatchewan (including Paddock Wood, Nokomis, Black Bridge Brewery, and Rebellion).
What I’ve been saying for months tbh, I get bored when the meta is stagnant and has a low skill gap. Right now, building is pretty much the only skill gap due to shotguns being fairly easy to use.
Newk didn't walk the first guy!
It really depends what/who you are listening to. There are way more than just gansta rap and stuff like that
- Action camera has a ton of objective upsides to it.  - The PSA isn't to turn it on, it's that it exists.
Same for Poland. Really good team on paper, shame they've been a bit shit so far.
My goodness. They should have their act together
Idd probably go with something less power hungry as i may add some peripherals later.
It just needs to be removed full stop, look at that a7x guy you see here every other week after he's cleaned, it's truly sad to see and you know he's not the only one with a legit addiction. I have no idea why it's still in the game given all the rwt associated with it
That's partially why Facebook is killing it atm. Zucc has almost full control. 
Yea, it is, it helps build your authority, while also making the author (if successful) into a brand (bigger impact than just SEO)
[Ineffectual](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MAC2xeT2yOg)? I can think of a better word.
I ask cuz I always heard it was not possible to see the white thread in th3 city. I'm also in the city. Its why I follow app calculations
It's pretty easy to pick apart other people's sources and provide nothing of your own, huh? At least 3 of those sources are well respected publications and you haven't provided anything. You'd rather just poke holes because that's easier than actually making an argument.  What's the point of this for you, anyway? Are you just being a troll or do you really think the media is worth defending?
Actually
I feel like most milestones are slow progressions to that “deadline” anyways. Walking, talking, and other milestones don’t magically happen one day. Your pediatrician will help assess if anything is behind or needs attention.   Babies meet milestones at different stages - and early or later, they equalize by 5 y/o anyways
I have gotten gold before soloing.
Some do, just like some ride around in groups breaking all kinds of traffic laws, riding down staircases, etc with stolen bikes or no plates.   https://www.sfgate.com/news/article/CHP-reviewing-video-of-Bay-Bridge-dirt-biker-mob-11014244.php  http://sanfrancisco.cbslocal.com/2015/12/22/apparent-leader-of-dirt-bike-group-pulling-stunts-on-sf-streets-may-be-marin-county-sheriffs-deputy/  https://hoodline.com/2017/03/spotted-dirt-bikers-ride-stairs-between-alchemy-by-alta-apartments  I'm not saying OP didn't do something wrong, but it's also not unlikely that the biker was just a massive dick.
Just out of curiosity what did you like about Branded because a lot of people say they liked it maybe I missed something 
Mate congrats :) mine will get better in someway someday.  The therapy pool is a humbling reminder. People get better. And there’s some worse off than me with healthy attitudes Remember it’s not about the handicap it’s about havin fun gettin it down. (And finding your balls ;) Keep on golfin bruv ;)
Can't hide from the truth fam
This post was marked as a question and has been removed to reduce clutter. If your question was not answered please repost in the Weekly Questions Megathread or Weekly Team Building Megathread linked at the top of the subreddit
Combined with 'Riles of the Game' which focuses on Hugh Evan-Thomas and Beatty(with some time on Jellicoe) you get a very solid if British centric and we'll rounded brief on the battle, the force that fought it, and how they came to be.
I think IS doesn't has a canon wife for anybody, except Alm and Celica, Sigurd and Deirdre (I feel bad for Sigurd...), and some others (a minority, actually), but oh well...
Kind of looks like The Dark Side of the Moon album cover. 
https://youtu.be/m1mhx7O3-LA  That scene absolutely destroyed me as a child ^  Still kinda does tbh.
I just make sure that me and my client dont have to deal with the CMFEU.  
Its nice, Keep practicing and it will look impossible to distinguish from real life in time.
Is this legal in your state? 
Good, It makes me feel better he's not a scumbag maroon
I lost a MWR TDM with 58 kills...I had 58 of 75 and we still FUCKING LOST
tbh I’d rather have Yuhua win instead of fucking Vixen  who jumped from 5000 votes after a week of voting to 2.5 MILLION overnight
It sounds like it will take the bad of FO 4 and make it worse. THat's basically what I'm gathering. The city thing should be removed and more focus put into quests and content and story.
I saw your Para Nnoi he's just sooo hot aaaaaahhhhh  I dunno tbh, I'm tired of not getting anything and somewhat scared of pulling haha  I just googled it, it seems kinda interesting! And the art is good too, maybe I'll tkae a look into it later ~~if I remember~~ lol  Edit: I pulled more 2 multi and still nothing ;-;
Ah alright, thanks!
It took a bit more work to fix than just new cables. The power supply had bad electrolytic capacitors and wouldn't turn on. Replaced those and it looks good for what was probably a Black Friday non-4K 50" HDTV. The only thing I don't like are the tinny internal speakers.
Spray foam the rafters, more insulation on the system, Get an energy audit. Your power company may have rebates.
Hey, thanks for the explanation! 
My 401k is going to be very happy, thank you President Trump!
Go upstairs and get fitted for your new clothes?
These wacky kids today with their wacky trenchcoats and wacky guns killing fellow students in the most wacky way possible!   Wait, that's not the definition of wacky? Who knew word definitions could be so difficult?!!!   /s
a  daddy, or a *daddy* daddy? 
All that time and still have no Pokemon Conquest 2. The real shame.
In the comics and some deleted/unused scenes from the movie there was a character called the skull cowboy who was brought back like Eric but lingered around too long. Would be interesting to see his story. 
Yeah, I think I'm going to allow them to take liberty and encompass the wider era than discrete historical accuracy. 
Very honestly. Maybe it's in professional life, it's apparently detrimental to have any association with trans women.
Excellent read for anyone that likes seduction and suspense.
wtf hahahah, this was inappropriate 
And it has no damage falloff, so even at longer ranges it hits hard as it shreds buildings. The main problem is that you need a ton of ammo for it to be effective.
No, A good chunk of that was released/performed/leaked before, on sight, new slaves, I am a god, black skinhead, send it up and half of Bound 2 leaked aswell.
haha nice 
Feel free to join us at /r/cherokeexj
BCH is the last resort. 
Surprisingly commulist for a buncha self-proclaimed “patriots,” eh Luigi?
We're an hour behind the east coast. 12am EDT would be 11pm here, so yeah.
Good one. You got me. Seriously I of course meant the mighty JP. If you’re a fan on YouTube there is a concert of them at their peak: Dortmund 1983. Halford on fire and the A/V quality is phenomenal!
&gt; WVU has a bit of a rivalry with VT, but it's not so aggressive as the rivalry with Pitt.  Its not far behind. 
True but he went after pop people and e entertainment regulars who never came for him, he could have extended his rage to say Jay, the same way he went on  limpbizkit
As a steady listener for the past 20yrs until about a year ago when I decided that was enough, can't remember the exact piece that made the decision for me but it was one I was well informed on and their take sounded like corporate speak from top to bottom. 
SemiAmusingBot says: I am now installed on a VPS. reply #3 test
Once again you pick out the one thing that you can use as an excuse not to do this. For reference, yes, I did grow up in a small Wisconsin town where people say hi, chat and are generally pleasant. I have also spent time in major cities and it was no big deal to say hi, how's it goin' or to ask for directions. I used to be like you where I would not interact with people because I thought it was inconvenient or I might bother them bit I had to learn to get over that. If I do bother someone the interaction is less than 30 seconds, they'll get over it.  Next, try going to places where people might expect someone to interact with them like a bar.  Since you seem to like a transactional approach just ask for the time.  "Hello, could you please tell me what time it is?" "I forgot my phone at work."  You could honestly be getting on the bus and say "hey" to the person you sit next to or across from. They my say "hey" back or give you that little head nod. A simple social interaction.  Because you NEVER see it happening doesn't mean it NEVER happens. There could be people sitting all around you willing to talk but not wanting to make the first move and that is where you have to step up and go for it. Like I said earlier, what is the worst that can happen? Seriously, what the fuck are you afraid of? They might not respond? Gasp! They moved to a different seat! Maybe they are having a bad day, you don't know, move on.
It's a ghost town, toys r us is gone and there might be a couple dozen cars if your lucky.
I’m still under the impression he guessed she was at home. So I guess a gamble was taken either way.
It's true
I tried writing a kernel module for this. So many bus lockups and fans locked on 100%
... With everything going on in this world sometimes I wish I did. "Ignorance is bliss." But ya, I think monogamous relationship (rarely) exist. My definition may just be different than others. But personally I believe people are so complexed and therefore needs and wants change over time. We are not the same person we were 5 years ago. Our lifestyle changes.  Therefore I cant see myself or others in a committed long-term relationship.  Thanks for your comment. 
Basically if it isn't obvoius why it is important to the story then the question becomes "Why did you add that detail?"   Usually there isn't a good answer for that.
I freaking got another Pikkon. I have 4star ssj goku, 3 star pikkon, and vegeta as my pulls. (I have pulled ssj goku 3 times) and still can't get a bloody Piccolo to save my life :( Not complaining that hard lol I am grateful af to have gotten that many good chars but piccolo is one of my og favs that I really wanted to pull.
Thats weird anyone know whats going on?
I fish for compliments. Form a line here and let them fly. 
You build a thousand bridges and they call you a bridge builder...
PPD- Captained EG to a TI win and one of the best drafters in the game. CCnC- Promising mid player with a lot of potential. Zai- Elite position 4 player. Played for some of the best teams in the world and is highly regarded in the community. 33- One of the top performers on the team since joining. Very versatile and can carry games. Pajkatt- Veteran player. Extremely consistent carry.
This is funny.
"Dad, I don't want to eat this salad, the leaves are stabbing my mou-"  ***"EAT THE FUCKING HOLLY, ABIGAIL!"***  Also the berries are [poisonous.](https://www.poison.org/articles/2014-dec/holly-berries) Though it sounds like it won't kill you.
idk just call ubisoft support sometimes your 90 in line other times your 5th in line
Nimmo's a star.
Monster Hunter has the most beautiful graphics. I get a bit dazed as I explore the lands.   Been playing the first Kingdom Hearts. I'm a bit pissed at Shadow Sora in Neverland lol.  This game would be fantastic for Wii &amp; VR =3 
Hopefully Canadians remember this the next time a 9/11 happens or otherwise America asks us for help. As someone else who was in the CF at that time, I hope we never send people to die for America again. Called a national security threat after all we gave. It's almost unbelievable.
"Everyone knows the best bands affiliate with Satan"  --Bart Simpson
So happy he's finally showing the world what he's got, wish the best for you d0cc, you got this!
Can you see my link to the OG thread? It's posted in a separate comment. If you click the link you can command f (or whatever the equivalent on your keyboard is) for the comment I posted.  Here it is again just in case: https://www.reddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/8mt8xg/why_women_shouldnt_vote/?utm_source=reddit-android  To recover the removed comment I used removeddit.  https://www.removeddit.com/r/TheRedPill/comments/8mt8xg/why_women_shouldnt_vote/?utm_source=reddit-android
Seriously.hate.summer.reddit
You can get your point across without being extreme. No the word fuck is not extreme for me, but saying anyone needs to die makes you look extreme unless the person is Hitler level
That sudden fast forward confused me so much lol I was like how can you be so fast in to turn 1
I like your wooden cladding on Heljarchen Hall.
Hey lads
I hope so much it's gonna be the rainbow 
Oh, must be a ring then. Been playing for a long time but I’m fractal noob. 
&gt; That’s anything but weird  If you think people aren't weird because they have a CIB, then you haven't met many people with a CIB.  Source: Has CIB.
Lol have fun raging come E3 hahaha. Going to be hilarious.
Hi, tomer_cool, thanks for your submission to /r/madlads! Unfortunately, your submission has been removed for the following reason(s):  The submission was not mad enough; your submission does not meet enough of our guidelines to be deemed "mad".  ***REMINDER***: We do ***not*** punish for posts that don't meet guidelines. If you feel that it has been removed in error, please [message us](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fmadlads) so that we may review it.
It won't flat out powercreep the 5A, it lacks the gun depression to do so. HEAT also gives a notable advantage at tier 10 due to the 85 degree ricochet angle (not to say 350 pen APCR means nothing), and its mobility is still arguably better. Slightly lower top speed and hp/t ratio, but significantly better terrain resistance stats and effective traverse.  430U isn't being powercrept either, it'll still likely have the armour advantage, and the mobility advantage is undeniable -- the medium tank effective traverse is what sets the 430U apart from other fast 'heavies'. Don't forget the camo, which is easy to get over 30% when stationary and like 25% when moving (iirc, don't have my client open) unlike every heavy ever.  It'll be strong, but I think it's about on par with the 5A and 430U. The only thing I would advocate nerfing for now, before it goes through the live server stages of testing, is the APCR pen and shell speed. 330-335 pen APCR with 1300 m/s or so would suffice, not 350 pen with 1800 m/s.
If you would like to transcribe this post, please respond to this comment with the word `claiming` or `claim` in your response. I will automatically update the flair so that only one person is working on a post at any given time.  When you're done, please comment again with `done`. Your flair will be updated to reflect the number of posts you've transcribed and the will be marked as completed.  Here's [a checklist](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/checklist) that might help you out -- not just for newbies!  This is a(n) image post, so please use the following formatting:  ---  **Note:** To use these format guides, all you have to do is copy and paste everything within the blue markdown box and replace the prompts with the relevant information. The two asterisks turn any text between them into boldtext, and the three hyphens in a row when separated by a blank row above and below will become a horizontal rule.  **Remember:** We want to transcribe the text directly, please do not make corrections to typos or grammatical errors, but feel free to use [sic] to indicate that the text is exactly as in the original. Please copy and paste any emojis into your transcription. --- [**Art and Images without Text**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/no_text) [**Images with Text**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/text) [**4chan &amp; Pictures of Greentext**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/greentext) [**Reddit Posts &amp; Comments**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/reddit) [**Facebook Posts and Comments**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/facebook) [**Twitter Posts and Replies**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/twitter) [**Comics**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/comics) [**Gifs**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/gifs) [**Text Messages (SMS)**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/textmessages) [**Code**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/code) [**Meme**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/meme) [**Other Sources**](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/format/images/other) --- [You can see some examples here of what we're looking for.](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/examples/images)  ---  Reporting ---  Please report this post if it contains personal information or otherwise breaks the rules of the subreddit we're linking to. The mods will check and remove it shortly.  If you have any questions, feel free to [message the mods!](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTranscribersOfReddit&amp;subject=General%20Question&amp;message=)  ---  Footer ---  When you're done, please put the following footer at the **bottom** of your post:  ---   ^^I'm&amp;#32;a&amp;#32;human&amp;#32;volunteer&amp;#32;content&amp;#32;transcriber&amp;#32;for&amp;#32;Reddit&amp;#32;and&amp;#32;you&amp;#32;could&amp;#32;be&amp;#32;too!&amp;#32;[If&amp;#32;you'd&amp;#32;like&amp;#32;more&amp;#32;information&amp;#32;on&amp;#32;what&amp;#32;we&amp;#32;do&amp;#32;and&amp;#32;why&amp;#32;we&amp;#32;do&amp;#32;it,&amp;#32;click&amp;#32;here!](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/index)  ---  ---  v0.4.3 | This message was posted by a bot. | [FAQ](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/index) | [Source](https://github.com/GrafeasGroup/tor) | Questions? [Message the mods!](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTranscribersOfReddit&amp;subject=Bot%20Question&amp;message=)
Seriously. This is the only political subreddit (at least that I've seen) that isn't a total echo chamber. It makes me genuinely happy to see this
u/haupt91 can make gifs *and* spit bars? Damn.
I made the following comment in a REEEEdacted thread about this a bit ago :  &gt;Looks like someone vandalized a Wikipedia article used as the basis for the Google info, probably to win a Reddit argument like was done with the Rasmussen Wikipedia article recently.  Surprising it's only at -3 right now.
*Someone* has to start 
&gt;oh was that why Obama cut funding then?  The discussed event has nothing to do with Obama, the dolphin language "experiments" took place in the 1960's.  Additionally, under the Obama administration NASA's budget went from a nominal amount of 17.833 Billion USD in 2008 to 19.508 Billion USD in 2016, an increase of 9% (though less than the estimated loss of purchasing power due to an estimated inflation of 11.5% in that same time period).  &gt; NASA 50/50 Florida and Texas  NASA has a presence at locations in Alabama, Australia, California, Florida, Louisiana, Maryland, Mississippi, New Mexico, Ohio, Spain, Texas, Virginia, and West Virginia.  With the majority of its personnel being located at the NASA headquarters in Washington D.C. and the following 10 field centers:   *  Ames (Research), located in Mountain View, California  * Armstrong (Flight Research), located in Edwards Air Force Base, California  * Glenn (Research), located in Brook Park, Ohio  * Goddard (Space Flight), located in Green Belt, Maryland  * JPL (Space Flight), managed by CalTech in Pasadena, California  * Johnson (Space), located in Houston, Texas   * Kennedy (Space), located in Merritt Island, Florida  * Langley (Research), located in Hampton, Virginia  * Marshall (Space Flight), located in Huntsville, Alabama  * Stennis (Space), located in Hancock County, Mississippi  Though the largest individual NASA facility is the Marshall Space Flight Center in Huntsville, Alabama, the majority of NASA employees are in California distributed amongst the 3 field centers and multiple associated research and development facilities.  
You can still buy them together it is just less common. 10-15 years ago, tablets and smartphones weren't really a big thing yet, so every casual user had to get a desktop. Because of that, they made easy everything included plug-and-play machines to appeal to those that just wanted to browse the internet and check emails. Nowadays, those causal users have moved on to the smartphones and tablets and sometimes even laptops while those who want a larger, more powerful machine tend to get the components that they want out of it and put it together themselves. When some components go obsolete, they replace them with better ones or, eventually, replace an entire tower and just reuse the monitor that had been using.
**HD** ENG [Golden State Warriors vs Cleveland Cavaliers 720p 4700kbps BT SPORTS 1 Feed](http://www.sportsstats.me/2018/05/golden-state-warriors-at-cleveland.html) AND |[Golden State Warriors vs Cleveland Cavaliers  ESPN Feed](http://www.sportsstats.me/2018/05/golden-state-warriors-vs-cleveland_31.html) AND |[Golden State Warriors vs Cleveland Cavaliers  ABC Feed](http://www.sportsstats.me/2018/05/golden-state-warriors-vs-cleveland.html) |AD Overlays:0 | Mobile compatible: Yes   SD |[ FRENCH Golden State Warriors vs Cleveland Cavaliers  BIEN SPORTS 1 F Feed](http://www.sportsstats.me/2018/05/warriors-vs-cavaliers.html) AND |[ENG Golden State Warriors vs Cleveland Cavaliers  ABC Feed](http://www.sportsstats.me/2018/06/golden-vs-cleveland.html)|AD Overlays:0 | Mobile compatible: Yes
Local store said June 1st they will have one being built to watch and available stock (which is probably like 2). 
Lol at the downvotes on your comment.   Coke looks nothing like this in real life. It’s much more thick/clumpy. The retards here think it’s like a fine flour like they see it in cartoons and shit. 
!invest100
The. Nimster.
They are worse than idiots. With Trump's antagonism towards Canada I would call them unpatriotic at the very least. If you like this asshole please leave and let the door hit you on the way out.
**HD** 720p60 | [**HD** ABC Feed | Cleveland Cavaliers @ Golden State Warriors](http://nba4live.fun/stream/live1) &amp;&amp; [**HD** ABC Feed (ADAPTIVE QUALITY) | Cleveland Cavaliers @ Golden State Warriors](http://nba4live.fun/stream/live5) | Ad Overlay: 1 (No POP UPS) | Mobile Friendly: Yes 
Did you even read her "proof" lmao?   Hint: she didn't actually have any.  And even then, this doesn't change the fact the primary was over, and that's why he conceded, meaning your argument is defeated.
oh whoops haha my bad  the main reason I thought you were referring to me was because I actually got pmed by a couple of people asking to buy some of "my" mercury ahaha
Versus back in the day, when everything was flat panel and it came in three sizes?
why would we grow our steel industry when we have the most educated workforce and the biggest tech market on the planet lmao  waste of our money
Yeah I normally do 3-400 ug but I did 600~ this past weekend and it was almost unpleasant for the first hour of the peak. I've never looked at the clock during a trip and thought "god damn I got a long time to hold it together" before. Probably sticking to 3-4 tabs per trip from now on... Until I get to feeling adventurous again.
When I figure it out. Lmao. 
Upvote this comment if this is a **DANK MEME**. Downvote this comment if this is a **BAD MEME**.
My dialect has the cot-caught merger. Those are the same vowel sound for me.
He will stay in his golf cart
You must be fun at parties
Smh we live in a society
hard work
**HD** : [Cavaliers vs Warriors ABC Feed **HD**](http://nowwatchtvlive.org/nba-league-pass-live-stream-watch-nba-league-pass-online/) | [Cavaliers vs Warriors BT Sport 1 **HD**](http://nowwatchtvlive.org/bt-sport-1-full-hd-live-stream-720-1080p/)  SD : [Cavaliers vs Warriors ABC Feed](http://nowwatchtvlive.org/abc-live-stream-watch-abc-channel-online-free/) | [Cavaliers vs Warriors BT Sport 1 Feed](http://nowwatchtvlive.org/bt-sport-1-hd-live-stream/) | [Cavaliers vs Warriors ESPN Deports ES Feed](http://nowwatchtvlive.org/espn-deportes-live-espn-deportes-online-tv-watch-espn-deportes/) | [Cavaliers vs Warriors TSN1 Feed](http://nowwatchtvlive.org/tsn-live-stream-watch-tsn-1-online-channel-free/)  **HD** | AceStream | BT Sport 1 | English | ABC | English | TSN | English    acestream://935f0bcdaea2fa04c0d86a90443e30afee813aae [HD] [ABC] [EN]   acestream://1a56abe18bf88d106581281784147bb675ab2ba6 [HD] [BT Sport 1] [EN]   acestream://00a2f4f090053063f2789663251e38726ca7bb95 [SD] [BT Sport 1] [EN]   acestream://e9bc9e766b2501282bec1c6b8a2e5c730ee080e1 [HD] [TSN3] [EN]   acestream://7990c2a159dd3741b8de7e672bbca5b30a82761a [HD] [ABC] [EN]  Ad Overlay: 3 | Mobile Friendly: No | NSFW: Yes
https://www.reddit.com/r/EliteAntal/comments/6aejlg/fortification_tracker_latest_update/
I mean, people can do what they want. But dont tattoo swears on your body.
Checked it out! Even has an EBM bass example on it. Awesome recommendation, for whatever reason I thought it was exclusively for mobile devices which is why I didn't investigate it further.
added
bleddyn45...a true wingman
Where's spelling bot when you need it
Lots of Mass subies on the sub today. 
Got anything to back up the assertion that Ripley and Sarah Connor are incompatible with modern movie trends?
just your shit pc mate
Congrats!!! :) :)
How much fun is making games for you?
Same pic just got posted in the live bot (I mean vote) counting thread.
Also for some more context, he's now campaigning for cartoon characters to be taken off sugary cereal to lessen the appeal to kids, which is the part relevant to this tweet in particular.   But the rest is important, because he's been doing this stuff for years and a lot of adults hate him for it. 
Melancholy of Haruhi Suzumiya.
You might as well buy some Ginsu knives.  Seriously though, a hone will prolong the shit out of your knife and knife edge. Without a hone, you’ll need to sharpen the knife far more often than necessary if you had been honing it. You also run a greater risk of chipping the edge as it will tend to roll over and then the greater force you need to use will compound the problem.
It was in on of forges comments. He said they are looking for a fix
Probably start with figuring out what's wrong with it. This picture is unhelpful.
People arent pissed as much about the paid emotes as they are about the emotes given are related to content. If it had no relevance to content that is current in the world of destiny no one would give 2 shits. Its a cheap tactic placing iron banner emote thats non earnable in the store and not even having it available for bright dust. Then to top it i can bet faction rallies will be the same. Its a joke. People want a reason to play. And without that why the fuck would they buy shit. Its a dick move
Because there isn’t a clause at all. Spanish media is infamous for being shit lmao 
yeah, they raised me a few cents only  cheap ass mofos i tell you..  these rich scums are blind when it comes to their employees 
Gladly
What?
Nope
Enough that they have a solid footing they can slowly rebuild on, and also not get away with blatant, agency-wide corruption anymore. Still room for evidence tampering and throwing cases, high-level arrests need to be conducted perfectly with no hitches.
In a 12 team league (flair) where you can trade next years draft picks, what draft pick is fair for Miguel Sano right now? I am trying to think of a fair offer to the owner of Sano who is selling his team for future picks
i know. as a parent this shit used to drive me mad. "Helicopter parent? of course i am. they're fucking children who will do any random stupid shit at any point in time!".  
I honestly see zero possibility of a second xc1 character... I mean these characters are cool but this isn’t the Mario or Zelda franchise. 
Well I don’t know anything about the process that led to Spotify tagging Flies as explicit and not Streaky, but Streaky’s the only one uploaded to their YouTube without lyrics in the description so I’m just assuming that’s not a coincidence.
For sure
When my husband was little and his mom was pregnant with his sister, they told him there was going to be a baby. They then asked him if he wanted a little brother or a little sister. "I want a robot."
Bad bait
Dream on
✔️ | **HD** | [Away Feed **HD** 6600kbps] (http://www.sportspf.com/watch/1002s-380531125e?link=1) | [Home Feed **HD** 6600kbps] (http://www.sportspf.com/watch/1002s-380531125e?link=2) | Ad overlays: 0 | Clicks: 2 | Works on all devices | Disable AdBlock: Yes | PS4 Should work Feedback needed.
Red X is generally an indication of a power issue. Is it a red X with a 3 or infinity loop it’s a different thing. Move the power source to the the dvr off any power strip or surge protector and plug it straight into the outlet. I imagine you’re using an HDMI connection to the TV, try using a different port on the TV or component connection instead. HDMI ports on a lot of TVs back feed static voltage that the set top box is sensitive to. The component cable will give you the same quality HD as the hdmi. But you’re right the pass through should have no impact on the dvr as far as a red X. I could see it being an issue if the picture on the dvr started to freeze and pixilate because of a bandwidth issues but not a red X. 
Sad it is Chinese [year.Plus](https://year.Plus) you need to qualify to say that...
Don't listen to him. This is a great idea and I for one am very excited. 
I really have no idea, but item rarity is so worthless, only arcanas and immortals are distinctive. The other could get in a big category all together and no one would care.
Can I speak to your manager? I don't feel so good...
That's awesome, though, omnibus for any series can be hard to find at a good price sometimes (at least for my cheapskate self who buys at least 80% of her books used haha). Enjoy the series! I know the translations between the two editions are different; it would be interesting to compare them
There's also a Rainbow Room, Gold, Hot Topic exclusive version.
About the Spyguy: The Anons on 4chan are parsing his posts as we speak, so why all the strum und drang? See for yourselves:   [https://8ch.net/qresearch/res/1587271.html#1596686](https://8ch.net/qresearch/res/1587271.html#1596686)
But were they strikes 
Oi, ya gits are askin to git da stompin!
Yeah I'm out. I have Note Edge it's in perfect condition. I have multiple batteries for it (main reason I still have it SD card and swap-able battery). Great phone and I love it. But NO updates...
Getting the Tuck In Here as instructed, sir!
Lisa had more confessionals than both of them too
Im just pointing out, no one cares about your opinion, and never will... do as you wish... kanye dont need your broke ass Spotify streams... kanye has been driving pop culture, and mainstream discussions for 15 years.
Shit made front page, yo
 never tried athleta actually. They look great online. 
I honestly don’t think 2-4 hour cinematic games would be a bad thing at all, it’s something I’ve thought about and wish someone would do, just a cool, focused, bite-size experience
As long as it pays the bills...
I always though Diebuster's Groovin Magic op was great.  And Tamako Market's Dramatic Market Ride!
Its just a new gametype.   MOBA's didnt destroy creativity, and neither did crafting/survival games. FPS games didnt kill creativity either (although FPS creativity/diversity WAS pretty stagnant until BR modes shook things up).  Its just a new (and therefore novel) gametype thats just recently caught on, and is getting a lot of hype, clones, and variations BECAUSE its something new and quality. The excitement will wear off over time, and BR will become its own established subgenre of shooters. Just because its huge now, as a newly popular genre, doesnt mean people or the industry will drop everything else forever. Its just the hot new flavor of the week.
**Nominating Lima**  13th at GENESIS 5, 5th at EGLX, 7th at Glitch 4, 5th at GOML, 5th at Momocon.  He's had his own bout of inconsistency at Frostbite, but I'd still say less so than Larry. His largest issue is that he's currently 0-5 against top 5 players, even if he's taken them to game 5 twice now (Tweek and Mistake).  Wins on Samsora x3, Mr. R, Larry x3, Elegant, ANTi, Ally, Manny, K9, Mr. E. He tends to find players he can beat and pile on them.
no thots &lt;3
Phat Farms
&gt;Specifically, they are looking for the driver of a 2008-2012 black Lexus with black wheels, lowered suspension, and an aftermarket exhaust system which was in the area when the crash occurred.  I'm betting they already have witnesses and this person was either racing them or it could have been a road rage incident. 
A 2.0 is a C where I’m at. 3.0 is a B. 
Please give your post a proper title, epic plz does not describe your issue   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/FortNiteBR) if you have any questions or concerns.*
What
Ok, mate.
Unless you're Winston, then you explode if you get stunned.
Oh oh, i got it! Everybody's favorite character, Joker's Daughter!!
Marv Albert hasn’t done anything wrong in years.  There’s nothing to get. Not everything is racist against black people. If Chris Brown ht Rihanna today he’ll never have another concert. If Marv Albert did what he did today, he’ll never broadcast another game.
Calories don't matter if I only eat green vegetables that day. I have a feeling whole foods = bread, potatoes and fruit smoothies though. Unlimited of that will fatten you up.
Belgium looks awesome on paper.
You cannot deny Love's contribution to the team, his rebounding and his soft touch with three-pointers. He is generally bad in defense, but he can always score important threes when you need to, and make good full court passes. Love doesn't get much respect, but he is quite intelligent on the court.
I didn't know someone could look so much like a child molester...
Time to eat mmmm
Ehhh that's a bit of a leap
Seriously. What, is all of Reddit now suddenly from the streets, in a live or die gang? Snitches get stictches or something?  He helped put suppliers of cocaine away to reduce his own sentencing. This is not a bad thing. This is common sense, and only shitty people are harmed.
+correct
SD 520p | [ABC FEED](http://primealpha.ml/nba-1.php) | Ad Overlay: 3 | Mobile Compatible: No
which in turn became Vigilante 8
*Whoa*.  This is amazing, the amount of detail squeezed into a small package is astounding. Both awe-some and inspiring at the same time.  Kudos man!
L
i don’t even get it 
Lost Grove is Wildwood, confirmed.  
Im not a depressed or self depreciating person tho. Even when i say the motivationaly fucked up stuff its never anything about me or my failures its always about how the world in genaral is crap and life is pointless
FromSoftware pls...
This is the shitpost I live for.
Youd want to eat them early before they can have much of an eco impact.  At least they'd be tender though.
Thanks a ton! That helps out a lot.  I may poke my head in /r/asklegal tomorrow morning and see if I can get any more info in addition to what I find.
On my desk sounds really good :)
Well, it seems Nazi mysticism actually amounted to something.  They managed to figure out how to let Orlok walk around in the daylight.
nothing, no marks
How does one laugh historically? 
CHECK THE WEBSITE!! VIDEO!!
It makes me wonder if they're just too afraid to even try playing without him as their caller or if they've tried playing without him and did even worse in scrims. 
I'm sry :(
Not if I can avoid it.. makeup is a huge turn off.
Hi there! This post has been removed for the use of old tags/flair such as [haul], [fluff], [PSA], [deals] or [discovery]. Please post all Fluff, Hauls, and Deals in our daily unstickied thread.  Our posting  guidelines are [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/AsianBeauty/wiki/postguidelines#wiki_about_post_flair.3A) for the complete list of approved user tags, as well as the best place to post your content. PM the mods with any questions you might have, we're happy to help. *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AsianBeauty) if you have any questions or concerns.*
See a doctor
There are definitely bulls in the bow south of the city.
Yeah it's awesome its not for everyone though, it's like the old fallout games   Kinda like xcom but an rpg with a story and choices and stuff It's kinda slow to start but really good if you get into it May as well try it out And don't worry about your gunshots missing at first, that happens until you level up a bit, confused me at first My best advice is to just go in blind, don't worry about googling stats or builds beforehand, just take a run at it and see how it goes you'll figure it out really quickly and things go terribly you'll know what's up for your second run
Lebron under the desk controlling Ty's mouth with strings.
[@IslandGrown11's latest tweet](https://i.imgur.com/C2oq7mF.jpg)  [@IslandGrown11 on Twitter](https://twitter.com/IslandGrown11)  -  ^I ^am ^a ^bot ^| ^[feedback](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=twinkiac)
Way to ignore my previous corrected post bud. 
"On the other hand, you can pay for our private servers :)"
Use the alley delivery area, use a smaller truck.  Not the city's problem
Can't miss out on [Los](https://youtu.be/HbgmivJulxs)! Been rocking this one all day. 
I’m not doing 3x10 yet, that’s my goal.  My form is good I think except my body is not straight due to using doorway pull-up bar. I tuck my legs in front of me, I find this more challenging than putting them behind me, and feel it hits the chest more. I think my range of motion is good, I could begin doing slower Eccentrics though.
Oh it's super easy - PTO
I mean if he's saying the margins are "in the thousands", I think its fairly easy to surmise that he means he's referring to a value. If there is a business with a profit margin in of over 1,000&amp;#37;, I'd like to be a part of it.
Tastytrade.com   Read the material, watch the videos. It’ll help you get an understanding of options valuation and how they work. They focus more on options selling strategies (e.g. credit spreads)  rather than buying (e.g. long calls long puts). 
that's 1:41 this post is FALSE
Had no idea about Coheed, thank you!!!
he was scared of dying. 
Gonna look into this for my 16, but what did you do for trailer lights? Is there a plug and play system?
A therapist is nice because its a nonjudgemental voice who you don't see outside of your sessions, mine didn't judge me for how I would handle my stress and never made me feel bad about myself, they just want to get to the bottom of why you're feeling that way and help. People aren't kidding when they talk about how much it helps.
That's great!
I wear a brace on my right knee.... My knee is nice and tan in that little circle around the kneecap 😄
Yes hiding assets is illegal and she will like be committing perjury multiple times when she fills out financial disclosures.  Plus it’s not difficult to figure out.
Beach House
1) Winning the American War of Independence - birth of the country  2) Louisiana Purchase - shaped the country and ensured we wouldn’t have to cross a n international border to get to California.   3) Union winning the American Civil War - Kept the country intact  4) Allied victory in WWII -  Our being pole vaulted above the Brits as leaders of the West at the end of WWII allowed for Pax Americana and US cultural dominance  5) 9/11 - Drastically reshaped American foreign and domestic policy as we entered the 21st Century. Still effecting decisions today (Patriot Act, spying, immigration, expansion of GWOT, etc)
Depends on you but Sharon is a must hero especially if youre a beginner, She can clear \(nearly\) all stages and modes in the game. Having her early will help you progress a lot on the game much faster w/ ease. but if u already invested some money in that account. Try to acquire her as soon as possible if u can. It will really help u a lot. \(Though i didn't get here early, i still manage to acquire t2 chars but i did struggle till now which slow down my progression on the entire game.\)
Yes, some folk just have no mute button. Depending on the person and how you want them to react to you "..and your tongue is sharp." "Yes, it's good isn't it." Leaving them confused and you knowing your body is working and shedding heat well.
It’s not so much sexism as it is homophobia, and repressed homosexual urges, as you can tell by the responses. 
The Russian mediums would not be called in clan wars so much if they didn't have dpm.
Dude I like Trump's policies I don't know what you want me to say. Not only do I like his policies but I just like my life a lot better with him as president I feel better. More smiles and more laughs with my family. I feel better knowing we have a president that puts America first.
Your submission has been removed because it was not an imgur link.  Please re-upload to [imgur](http://imgur.com) and resubmit.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AmateurFucking) if you have any questions or concerns.*
&gt; But while it doesn’t pass the smell test for some, **the behaviour isn’t against the law or the councillors’ code of conduct, according to municipal law experts.**  Better luck next time, leftists...  https://www.thestar.com/news/city_hall/2013/12/12/video_shows_councillor_doug_ford_handing_out_20_bills_at_tchc_building.html
Dat arm doe....
Co-produced by Pat, with all other producers only producing a couple songs each, similar to Pacific Daydream. 
That was a Twitter post
Makes sense. Huge guys never seem to work too well for me (assumingly) because I don't have great internet, they always feel a step slow.
Note: this includes user mentions in reddit comments with links to the voting site. Please do not do this.
Roofied means being given a drug without your knowledge. Often by people intending to rape or abuse people, they slip the drug into a drink and the victim becomes drugged. Usually these drugs leave the victim unable to remember anything. 
**Attention! [Serious] Tag Notice**  * Jokes, puns, and off-topic comments are not permitted in **any** comment, parent or child.  * Parent comments that aren't from the target group will be removed, along with their child replies.   * Report comments that violate these rules.  Posts that have few relevant answers within the first hour, and posts that are not appropriate for the [Serious] tag will be removed. Consider doing an AMA request instead.  Thanks for your cooperation and enjoy the discussion!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Fair enough but would that change your time of when you were supposed to die. Honestly man it’s just a rabbit hole and I’m having fun with it
Sorry, thought I replied directly to this post.  My reply is below.
Lol
Thank you!!!
I don’t have coins but I’d be willing to offer trades 
I don't understand how a reskin will make it cost money either way it won't be a simple copy and paste work will need to be done.
Breaks controller then throws pieces at wall. That's my most hated part of the game. 
Chaos is not a strategy! This isn’t an orgy or a robbery.   Wait — on second thought, maybe it is at least one of those things. 
Cool :)
banned
already been announced though. No surprises if that's all they announce.
[She's a "silithid reaver", apparently.](https://hearthstone.gamepedia.com/Clutchmother_Zavas)
No one has ever had an issue when I pass it around. Cant be any worse bacteria wise than passing a joint around.
I watch it because it gives me a laugh. Not because he has any sanity or that I respect his takes.
Zwi-Hander. 377 voidlock with cannon 
Another happy landing 
Debt as in loans for business and mortgages would still be measured in fiat.   If and when bitcoin gains a sizeable adoption size, where it is practically ubiquitous, fiat will still exist. But it won’t have such a sizeable control over the levers of the economy. After all, in the US alone, it’s trillions in debt is measured in dollars. For the government to pay its debts, dollars must still exist. And from the looks of that debt level, it’s going to be doing so for quite some time.   So back to the lending argument. Loans could be made in bitcoin, but priced in dollars. For example, let’s say I get a $100k mortgage loan. But let’s also say that in that time, 1 BTC = $100k. So the bank lends me 1 BTC....but the size of the loan at date and time it is written and signed for is fixed at $100k... plus any interest.   If 30 years from that point 1 BTC appreciates in value to $200k = 1 BTC.... well that works for me and I can pay the $100k loan back and sti have some satoshis left over.  If the opposite happens and 1btc falls to $50k.... then I owe 2 BTC to pay for the original $100k loan.   Fiat will still exist and will serve as perhaps a fixed point of accounting for debt/loans at the time they were made.
**HD** | [ Adaptive ABC International Feed **HD** 3500kbps 720p 60fps Rewind 2 mins ](http://icelz.6te.net/abc.php) | [ Adaptive ABC USA/CA Feed **HD** 4000kbps 720p 60fps ](http://icelz.6te.net/abc2.php) | Ad Overlay : 1 | Mobile: Yes | Console: Yes
[Armageddon!](https://youtu.be/cTrOb8zyrZk)
LE
F
This is completely false. Tariffs *significantly* reduce output and are a very bad way of generating revenue. The gain in tariffs is more than offset by the loss in income tax.
The music is what makes it. It still gets me hyped to hear. 
let’s of demon rape and dead demon baby things
That’s awesome though man, good job!
Ok
I did that step though... could it be because I merged them into one layer? 
Really? Man, that's weird. Someone really needs to hit him with that in a debate.
Maybe, I'm not sure. Haven't had chameleos turn into a worgen card since the nerfs.
How do  you sleep on one?
Your post has been removed. Due to the amount of people posting the daily shop, including new items, we are allowing the stormshieldonebot to post the list of daily items, including a quality screenshot of the store daily from yourboytay so the sub does not get flooded with shop sale posts. Thank you for your understanding. *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/FortNiteBR) if you have any questions or concerns.*
https://www.amazon.com/Barbras-Satin-Bikini-Underwear-Medium/dp/B079VBN1KY/   https://xdress.com  It’s a start. Hope it helps. 
You remind me of my uncle who once stated “I don’t want to go acquiring a taste for something I’m never going to eat again” when we suggested going out for Korean food. You never know what you’re missing (or not) until you push you boundaries a little. I hope you take the risk one day:)
&lt;3
Ganyan din ako dati e. May halfday sat pa. Buti nakahanap ako ng work na mon to fri lang haha. Sayang din yun sa halip na uuwi na sa province ng fri night ay di ka makauwi kasi may sat work pa
You asked, "What's she the leader of?" If you don't want to hear the answer, don't ask the question.
Pusha T got professional ghost debaters damn
All of those companies weren’t Chinese owned when they “went big” 
We do ask that questions on this sub be as clear and specific as possible. If you could narrow it down a little, both in terms of region and time period, perhaps focus in on what exactly you're trying to find out, you may reword and resubmit.
I have found the behavior of various Choni fans unpleasant myself, and the fact that some of them ship Madelaine (who seems to have a boyfriend) with Vanessa takes 'real life shipping' to a brand new level of offensive. However, do we have actual proof that this RAS incident happened beyond what the anonymous poster wrote? Methinks we should wait and find out first.
Then I saw her face, now I'm a believer  Not a trace, of doubt in my mind  I'm in love, and I'm a believer  I couldn't leave her if I tried
The only solo game that one can play and never get tired of beating it daily. 
AOC AGON AG271QX  I got it because it was cheap and seen great reviews online praising it. here's a TL:DR from Tomshardware  PROS:  30\-144Hz FreeSync range  Ghost\-free overdrive  Bright picture  Great color after calibration  Uniformity  Panel response  Low input lag  Build quality  CONS:  Out\-of\-box accuracy  Viewing angles  "The AG271QX requires some tweaking for best results, but once you change a few settings, you’ll get to enjoy a nice image with some of the best motion processing we’ve seen from any FreeSync monitor currently available."  review: [http://www.tomshardware.co.uk/aoc\-ag271qx\-agon\-27\-inch\-freesync\-monitor,review\-33751\-6.html](http://www.tomshardware.co.uk/aoc-ag271qx-agon-27-inch-freesync-monitor,review-33751-6.html)
Wtf they have slides at Busch?
More faction rallies would be nice since they seem to be a rare sight for Destiny 
It's an antenna plug (the top) which was a suggestion composite cable that carried picture and sound and a hell of a lot of static.
She stole $20,000 dollars. That's an INSANE amount of money. You have to put effort in to use that much  I think you need to have a conversation about this. 
So I've just discovered Murphy's Soap Oil and it's changed my life. I regularly get pen, marker, pen, coffee and oil stains on my clothes - and this has seriously worked on everything. It couldn't hurt to try!
Hell nah, I need that crunch 
Andere Quellen zur (möglicherweise) gleichen Meldung:  * [Lufthansa-Aktie Aktuell - Lufthansa notiert mit 1,7 Prozent geringe Verluste](https://www.focus.de/finanzen/boerse/aktien/lufthansa-aktie-01-06-2018_id_8963173.html) (focus.de) * [ThyssenKrupp-Aktie Aktuell - ThyssenKrupp fällt mit 1,4 Prozent gering](https://www.focus.de/finanzen/boerse/aktien/thyssenkrupp-aktie-01-06-2018_id_8963180.html) (focus.de) * [Evotec-Aktie Aktuell - Evotec fällt mit 1,4 Prozent gering](https://www.focus.de/finanzen/boerse/aktien/evotec-aktie-01-06-2018_id_8963189.html) (focus.de) * [Infineon Technologies-Aktie Aktuell - Infineon Technologies notiert mit 1,4 Prozent geringe Verluste](https://www.focus.de/finanzen/boerse/aktien/infineon-aktie-01-06-2018_id_8963171.html) (focus.de) * [Volkswagen-Aktie Aktuell - Volkswagen verzeichnet mit 1,9 Prozent geringe Verluste](https://www.focus.de/finanzen/boerse/aktien/volkswagen-aktie-01-06-2018_id_8963181.html) (focus.de)
Reeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeepost!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  This is the most reposted meme I have ever seen.
Just call me...JUST JACK
Gave them food. 
Got it... Still a corset 
This technically the law for now and perhaps until Twitter becomes irrelevant: http://www.washingtonpost.com/blogs/the-switch/files/2018/05/Ruling.pdf
Thank you, /u/x_scion_x! You have awarded karma to user /u/Maelmute.  --Moderators of /r/snuggly
What would be great is if Trump resigns in disgrace/is impeached and his children take their horrid families over to Russia or China and we never have to hear about any of them ever again.  Just kidding Don Jr. will run for President just as soon as he gets out of prison.
What a waste it was a good casting and I don't think he even spoke before getting killed easily.
Archive links for this post:   * **Archive:** https://archive.is/ZM7AT  ----  I am Mnemosyne reborn. Better than Civ 5 with the Brave New World expansion pack. ^^^/r/botsrights
I’m in the AV trade as well, but have many racks we terminate and pull a shit ton of wire, There’s only been a couple of jobs where we’ve had to pull this much wire. 
They usually go for the easy ones to copy, TI4 would be pretty hard to forge in my opinion.
/r/unexpectednorm
He thought he was going to die to Brigitte. The match was in overtime, so he tried to use his ult on Brigitte before the death.
Don't do that. Residue is not for kids... Pretty poor decision.
great numbers! good luck!
E
or consume
Okay cool. I'm hoping AWD will be enough
It's been boring since day one, it's old to play and old to watch
well trump thinks he can just have the us claim bankruptcy and rename it something like  trump states and the statue of liberty will get a revamp to look like ivanka.
Don't bring it up with her, it won't accomplish anything.  Tell your credit card company what you know and let them go after her.  If you don't want a criminal conviction then you will have to pay this money because your cc company certainly isn't going to just let the debt go.
&gt;Great Minds Think Alike  Even the sick ones
It’s about both. 
England is a joke
Thats already out right? Were probably going to the parks this weekend so if its there i can
its an exaggeration lol
bwaHAHAHAHAHA!
Mr. Stephen A. Smith is my very dear friend and a class act. Find a new slant.
yeah thanks
Now that Pimax finally shipped headsets to testers hopefully we won't have to wait long.
Depends on what you're buying. If I'm hunting down specific things I check online, then go to the LCS and see if I can beat them.
I see house of Bolton has a new castle!
Moonbow is inferior to luna on a brave build, unless you run quickened pulse. Luna is guaranteed to proc if you are quadding, and will deal significantly more damage than moonbow
Lilacs, basil and tomatoes. 💖
https://www.reddit.com/r/EliteAntal/comments/5vif5h/request_for_immediate_action_vote_consolidate/
Brb burning house down
His replies were so ridiculously wholesome aswell
Yeah, the HID lights are probably the most modern part of my car as well, haha.
Yup. Even if mastering the day is just folding the laundry that’s been on your bedroom floor for months.  One day at a time.  
12am EDT happens when this comment is 3 hours and 59 minutes old.  You can find the live countdown here: https://countle.com/4gcI201331  ---  I'm a bot, if you want to send feedback, please comment below or send a PM.
**Review: #16**  This is a sample of 18 yr. rum from Nicaragua,. bottled by Hunter Laing’s Kill Devil label at 60.2% ABV. I’ve been a fan of both the Golden Devil and Kill Devil series in the past.  ---  **Kill Devil – Nicaragua – 18 yr. – 60.2%**  **Nose:** Big oak. Wet tobacco. Spray paint. That’s about it, but they’re all extremely clear and rich notes.  **Palate:** Raisins. Citrus. Massive oak. Chewing tobacco.   **Finish:** Under ripe banana. Cinnamon. Barrel char. Faint charred vegetal note.  **Strengths:** It’s complex and full of character.  **Rough Spots:** This one can get hot and sharp here and there.  **Grade: B/B+**  **Final Thoughts:** Another really interesting pour from Douglas Laing. This and the Bellevue had me considering grabbing backup bottles. Both were a good value for their age and specs, but they also both left me believing I hadn’t yet tasted what the distilleries were capable of.  ---  **GRADING:**  **A:** Truly memorable for all the right reasons. Pours I’m gonna be craving later. I’d buy a backup at the right price.  **B+:** Hits all the right notes with one or two exceptional ones. Just missing the crave worthy component.   **B:** Quality standard pour if priced accordingly.  **C:** Less interested. Minor flaws that start to diminish enjoyment. Situational purchase, but unlikely I’d buy a full bottle.  **D:** Major flaws. Won’t be repurchasing in any format – single glass or bottle.  **F:** No desire to keep drinking except to confirm it’s really as bad as I thought.
Gotcha. That makes sense that it's a regional thing. Not found here in a younger western city.
Excuses. I mean, yeah I understand the point about the content consumption rate but they had much better systems in D1. How can they just forget all of those lessons? 
Hop off my man’s dick 
The first one was just a bit too good. To be honest I'm gonna watch it anyway so I might as well tune in on the app that gives me free stuff, even if it's just a free Forza driver skin or whatever.
Trying to figure out the punchline...
Technically, if they were illegal, they have already committed a crime.
You know who actually doesn't need help being discredited?  Here's a hint: I'm replying to their comment.
"All" Melvins for sure, but prefer old.
i was not surprised by his actions this episode, because Luke has always been apathetic as hell. before Gilead, during the rise of Gilead... even his escape from Gilead was a combination of other people's effort and sheer dumb luck.
I tell people all the time: it's not the card-carrying, registered, CW permit-holders you need to worry about!
Added, and I second that.
So terriers are your dog kryptonite?
Surprising because it is so close? I am guessing you dont live in a large city? :b   I have seen much much closer than that, like 10-15 meters a few times. 
Oh come on...you yourself stated that it would be "a shit show". This implies you know there will be friction because of it, that's the whole basis of your first comment in this thread. Doing something you know other's won't like is the definition of starting shit.  Anyways, I hope none of this is an issue and we can all just watch the game like normal people.
Thanks friend, your positivity gives me strength and hope!
Salve, sono un avvocato sempre in cerca di clienti scaltri. Sono quelli che danno le migliori soddisfazioni. Si denunzia, si denunzia? Pratico sconti del 25% per denunzie di gruppo.
Thanks! I appreciate it.
This particular patch is from a Supreme jacket, not sure if that helps.
&gt;  It's finite though, plus there are a limited number of motes for sale per boss, and they compete directly with the new abilities.  Isn't is 100 of each mote type per Torment? That's *technically* finite but more than the number of rubies available even if you can sub 30 all three (480), even before considering buying the ability records or job motes.  More accurate to say the rubies are finite (and a total bitch to get), though. In JP you could get 1200 of each mote so far, but the rubies are the issue.
So you’re telling me if there was a dude in the game with a prosthetic the outrage would be the same? 
Sex
Try signing out of iCloud on iPad then sign in again  Same for APTV
The ADAC Lower has quite a few more features than a standard lower. And I can't describe the quality of it, I've never held anything like it.
[https://m.imgur.com/a/Y5Rz8](https://m.imgur.com/a/Y5Rz8)   I’ll try and find a model 
It feels like a death sentence. Never thought I’d miss twitter that much
No. You put your hand inside the basket, pick up a fried item using your hands, and consume the item with your mouth.  You can see that they are already cooked, meaning that they do not have to be fried again.
Knock knock. Who's there? Go fuck yourself, Pence.
The Internet doesn't really have a central location that it's 'housed' at, it's more of a backbone that has many vertebrae in the form of 'core routers' that are generally the highest speed and most bandwidth routers on the network.
**HD** | [BT Sports 720p option 1](http://www.streambeacon.stream/2018/05/cleveland-cavaliers-vs-golden-state.html) | [BT Sports 720p option 2](http://www.streambeacon.stream/2018/05/cleveland-cavaliers-vs-golden-state_31.html) | [BT Sports option 3](http://www.streambeacon.stream/2018/05/cleveland-cavaliers-vs-golden-state_34.html) | Ads Overlay: 0 |  Pop: 2 | Mobile : Yes 
Holyshit the difference
Mby if they one of them didn't have cast time and they didn't have different cooldowns
He needs to do an AMA. Man must have a lot of knowledge
@acyph  Work out Cook great food
My wife got a similar message supposedly linking to a video titled "fuck [my wife's name]". When she clicked on it, it asked her to sign into her Facebook account. She received the message on Facebook Messenger from a friend of hers. She was already signed into her Facebook account. She immediately knew it was a scam, and didn't give them any info.
Crazy that Vesey got to the draft combine as a 12 year old.
N
The facefuck position?
I like Carmella a lot. She is very interactive with the crowd and she is over from my perspective. 
70s thunderstruck \(before it's time\)  80s "  90s fuck yeah, thunderstruck w/ video  00s encore of thunderstruck  10s thunderstruck, 2nd encore  20s thunderstruck in VR / AR
Nope
I'm guessing you knew your opponents cycle in each of those plays? 
From what I gathered the bidding agents (gaining leadership) is jockeying to get the people they have ID’d as desireable.
Someone give AsiaBot a little of whatever AquaBot has :(
Thank you so much for giving a detailed analysis. I also have a few question and want want to explain some things.  &gt;Shadow seemed to drift unnaturally frame to frame. -yeah, the shadow was a last minute addition and by that point, I was so tried that I didn't try anymore =_=  &gt;That double hop added life to it -what's a dubble hop? (Srr new to terminology)  &gt;Face on the jump up was too deformed: but maybe you're implying it's a REALLY law-of-physics-breaking-fast jump -you're right! That's exactly what I was going for. I wanted to see how far I could push the bend and stretch motions
P
I don't know maybe hara will get tired of writing ,after all working as a mangaka is exhaustiing,only a few can have that freedom like miura,togashi,inoue but all of them have several hits under their belts and this the author first hit  manga,personally i don't mind mind if the author take his time as long we get good quality.
But a B17 phone wouldn't be able to pick up A+B at all right?
I think Coca-Cola just wants parity in the prices.
When will you guys be running the twitter giveaways? Was still waiting to hear about the winners!
if you see an 18650 rated over 3000Mah and it costs less than 10 bucks, be VERY suspicious. if its over 3500Mah its damn near 100% bullshit.
Less chance of someone breaking in.
There's a theory that 2-D's getting a big ol' ego since Muds was locked up. Maybe the trip was Russ trying to keep him in check? The trip did seem like an arse move eitherway though. 
Shouldn’t these guys be in prison for owning slaves? Symbolic humiliation doesn’t really cut it.
I think you did a decent job at keeping things civil and seem receptive to the debate at least. There’s always more ground to be made when people try to stay reasonable with each other. It’s really difficult when its an issue that is so emotionally charged, but it’s still possible. Sorry you got the downvotes, but at least know we’re not all gonna immediately shut you down if you stay civil. I think plenty of the people here do genuinely want to help.   Being able to truly see through another person’s perspective is one of the most difficult things for the human psyche to accomplish, but it’s valuable. I really hope and encourage you to stay open to these debates, even when it’s frustrating.
NO. EMBER. SPIRIT.
Go to her door with your scalpel and tell her you're a medical student who needs to practice.
Neon did a very cool article about understanding the Q clock.   Maybe some  new post tomorrow? or maybe also June 5? Maybe some big campaign from June 5 thru 13th ?  not sure how to read the clock yet.
Unclear. Are you asserting that procreating determines a man’s value? Or are you asserting that having some value is a prerequisite to procreation? 
I can't bear any more of these announcements
Get the sharpie \- size large, your stones, a towel you can throw away and some acetone or nail polish remover.  Paint the whole blade with the sharpie.  Let dry a few min.  Then commence some sharpening.  After a min and a few strokes you should be able to see zactly where you are putting the blade to the stone.  Adjust as necc to work the edge and just behind the edge.  Refresh the sharpie if necc. Work till you have a burr then flip the knife over.  Refresh the sharpie as necc and repeat on other side.  As noted, Jon covers this in one of his utubers.  And better than I did.
Yes, thankfully I have no examples of someone being killed for adultery in the last four hundred years as a result of religious belief.  Hopefully in another four hundred years I won't have examples of religious belief being used as a pretext for slavery or discrimination either.
It dies a lot, in many ways. Sometimes in darkness.
here just in time for nimmmmmzz
[I...don't](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/17.png#sprite) want to have to do this. Kazuichi and Gundham...they may have been unreliable at times, but I would never wish...  [...I](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/10.png#sprite) guess it's too late for that. I'm not that smart, so I don't know if I'll be of any help, but I'll try my best. Everything started that morning, at 8:00 AM. We were discussing Monokuma's presentation over breakfast when he showed up, giving us those shrink-wrapped books with information on the supplies.  [I](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/09.png#sprite) think it was...Kiyotaka who was trying to get us all to split up an investigation. I didn't think I'd be of much help though, and Hiyoko wanted to hang out on the 1st island beach, so I offered to come around later to check on everyone and take photos if needed.  [I](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/12.png#sprite) went to the beach with Hiyoko at around 8:15 AM, and she showed me a new dance! It looked so graceful and beautiful, I just had to take pictures!  [In](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/14.png#sprite) fact, it helped me...take my mind off of things for a while. Thank you, Hiyoko. Really.  [I](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/00.png#sprite) departed at 9:00 AM, and got to snapping pictures at each location, just in case. I think that took about...15 minutes or so. I met with Kiyotaka, Rantaro, and Maki at the restaurant afterwards to discuss the supplies.  [After](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/10.png#sprite) the meeting, Maki asked me to come with her to investigate the hospital. I accepted, and we arrived there at around 9:30 AM. Unfortunately, I didn't find anything out of the ordinary.  [We](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/04.png#sprite) were about to leave at 10:40 AM, but then, out of the blue, Maki dashed out of the hospital! Of course I was curious, and so I followed her to Electric Avenue, where I discovered she was guarding the store from Kokichi.  [Jeez,](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/11.png#sprite) you always have to be trouble, don't you, Kokichi? When are you going to man up and stop acting like a child?  [Anyway,](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/02.png#sprite) I decided to stick around because of that meddling menace, but after a half-hour, Maki said she could handle it, so I left.  [I](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/09.png#sprite) figured that'd be as good a time as any to develop my photos, so I headed to the printer over at Rocketpunch Market at 11:15 AM. I figured having a physical copy would be better, anyway. Once that was done, I dropped them off at my cottage and came to lunch at around 11:50 AM. The only people absent were...Kazuichi, Angie, Korekiyo, Rantaro, Kaito, Himiko, and Keebo.  [There](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/01.png#sprite) better be a good reason for each of you not showing up. Especially you boys, and you better not lie, either!  [At](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/16.png#sprite) noon, Hiyoko was trying to get my attention, and I accidentally ended up dropping and breaking a glass as I was about to get a drink. You don't have to be so forceful, okay, Hiyoko?  [She](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/13.png#sprite) really wanted to go to the amusement park that day, so a bit later, we left and had a great day. We went on rides, ate some cotton candy, and all of the other good stuff. I'm so glad I got to spend that time with you today, Hiyoko.  [We](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/06.png#sprite) started heading back at around 2:10 PM, but...that was when we heard it. Kazuichi's BDA, informing us of a body in the diner.  [We](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/07.png#sprite) were about to head over, but then we heard the explosion over at the 5th island! We rushed over there, and we happened to bump into Kokichi, so we told him about what we heard.  [But](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/18.png#sprite) then we headed into the weapon shed of the military base, a-and...  [...we](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/17.png#sprite) found Gundham's lifeless body, and the BDA played once again.  [During](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/06.png#sprite) the investigation, I figured I could use my camera for pictures to figure out if anything was taken. But the weapons were so scattered, so I'm not sure if even that will do any good, and I didn't have time to check either set of photos...  [I](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/09.png#sprite) wanted to investigate the other places, but I didn't want to just leave the body. Luckily, Kaito showed up, so I asked him to stay while I went around to the pharmacy, where I ran into Kaede, Ibuki, and Keebo, and to Electric Avenue, where I ran into Himiko, Angie, and Kiyotaka.  [Also,](https://abimon.org/dr/busts/mahiru/10.png#sprite) I should mention that I lost my purple cleaning rag for my camera. I could have sworn I had it at around lunchtime, but...oh well. That's all I've got.
lol. go look at their past two years and tell me how they're doing. Much more indicative of their performance. 
Cheap hotel?
Still blamed on the US, or claimed to have been unnecessary, it seems
That you dumb AF?
Thanks for the good info! Definitely sounds awesome to not shave certain areas long term.
I didn't say it was a bad system. We've had our success with it, it just isn't a system that runs as many "safe" throws as other teams tend to do.  And saying Cam can't do pre-snap reads or quick passes is ridiculous. Do you even watch any Panthers games or are you just going off of a stat sheet?
https://youtu.be/V9AbeALNVkk
You can get 2 each in isz and lower loran.  Running to lecture building is the best option for getting 2 easily.  Lower loran is a bit more difficult than isz.  Best option : Get 2 from lecture building and see if you can buy 2 more for 5 insight each. Else get 2 more from isz or lower loran.
Hi, newbie here. Why is it so important to get the rod of discord? What is the benefit of being able to teleport like that? 
Trumphets are so solemn
Regardless of your view on the merits of the case, he is a very successful advocate for his client asofar
I let my sister talk me out of what Ryan started the fire with. I said Pita but she insisted it was a Panini. I caved and we got it wrong.   Also couldn’t remember how many pounds Jim pledged to lose during the weight loss challenge. I said 60. It was 65  Forgot the name of the receptionist that replaced Pam during art school. Ronnie  Out of the 40 questions those were the only ones my team missed
Which console?
You are the same as me. A girl I was seeing always wanted me to text her when I got home after seeing her as well as the ones you mentioned and I always hated it. It was new to me, and I only had one relationship prior where we didn't do this just because we'd normally start texting anyway when I got home, but to me it just felt so invasive.   I think it really is a personal preference. For me it always feels like they don't care how my day was but they're just doing it because it's etiquette to ask, yet almost everyone I meet does this as normal. In a relationship it's fine but when you've just met someone and things are just starting, that separation is key. I don't want someone watching over my shoulder when they've only just entered my life. 
We're 100% salt
It's pretty obvious Pearl is the opposite. She may *ACT* like it, but when she says lines like "I'm just a Pearl i can't do anything by myself" and "I just wanted to fuse as Sardonyx to feel powerful for once" it's hard to miss. Pearl is a walking talking mass of insecurities and false bravado.
Where in Vancouver if I might ask? 
Doomsday. For me deck building is the real fun part of mtg so why not build a deck mid game?
you don't stay in Orlando!  You drive 45 minutes East to Cocoa beach or West to Tampa or South to the keys! 
Hauskaa kuinka sinun ensimmäinen ja toinen lauseesi on vähän ristiriidassa toistensa kanssa, ensin sanot kuinka Mikko ei osaisi muka ryöstää ja myydä ryöstettyä tavaraa ja kuinka ei kuitenkaan jaksaisi edes lähteä mitään ryöstämään jos ei töihinkään jaksa (pääse), seuraavassa lauseessa kehuskelet kuinka nälkä on niin kova motivaattori saada ihminen tekemään mitä vain ... ?
It looks like there's text in this image. I've tried to transcribe it automatically, but I'm still learning -- this may be inaccurate. At the very least, hopefully it will serve as a decent starting point for your work!  Please note that any formatting instructions above override whatever I provide, so please format my content accordingly if you choose to use it.   Process time: 1.816s  ---  v0.4.3 | This message was posted by a bot. | [FAQ](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/index) | [Source](https://github.com/GrafeasGroup/tor) | Questions? [Message the mods!](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTranscribersOfReddit&amp;subject=Bot%20Question&amp;message=)
Love your poster, but according to Songkick, Stonefield is the opener.
Wut
Prison? What?  I was under the impression it was a meditation/yoga camp! /s
I've taken the liberty of creating an archive link to get around Philly.com's paywall.  You can access the archive using the following address: http://archive.is/pqr0f. (If you would like to support Philly.com financially, consider these options: https://checkout.philly.com/.)
Impractical jokers, my go to boredom show
And Mamaste to you! 
It’s coming up on the 4th and we haven’t scored. I can smell the tinder smoking in this gdt. Gonna be a dumpster fire soon 
I think we might be in for two different main radio stations. I imagine the Vault Radio will fill the seat of the typical 50s-swing jukebox that we've had in all the other games. However, I'm also inclined to believe that we'll probably get a more country, southern oriented channel, probably run by some hillbilly outside of the Vault.
This seems to break rules of equivalent exchange 😂
SOMEONE ELSE???!?!?!  HOLY SHIT WHAT THE FUCK COULD HAPPEN 
They already made a kart racing game set in the wasteland, it's called Jak X Combat Racing.
I guess Lugo is only fast when falling off a mound for a head start.
den var grov
You could, pretty easily, automate that if you were really motivated. I'd be shocked if there wasn't already some code out there to do basically this. 
Right, well that's kinda the whole point of all this hoorah my dude
The negative experiences causing an emotional reaction that results in irrational overgeneralization.   Also you are making the assumption that your experience will be the same for their son, and talking about it as if it was factual.   Normally, this would be fine as it only affects you, except you are spreading misinformation and potentially causing people to not seek proper treatment. Your description of these drugs is not how these medications work and is not their 'primary' function at all.  
Dang you're almost there! :) halfway man you got this!
#####&amp;#009;  ######&amp;#009;  ####&amp;#009; [Hedron Alignment](https://img.scryfall.com/cards/normal/en/ogw/57.jpg?1517813031) - [(G)](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Card/Details.aspx?name=Hedron%20Alignment) [(SF)](https://scryfall.com/card/ogw/57?utm_source=mtgcardfetcher) [(MC)](http://magiccards.info/query?q=!Hedron%20Alignment)   [Rite of Replication](https://img.scryfall.com/cards/normal/en/c15/105.jpg?1519044749) - [(G)](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Card/Details.aspx?name=Rite%20of%20Replication) [(SF)](https://scryfall.com/card/c15/105?utm_source=mtgcardfetcher) [(MC)](http://magiccards.info/query?q=!Rite%20of%20Replication)   [Scourge of Valkas](https://img.scryfall.com/cards/normal/en/ima/145.jpg?1517813031) - [(G)](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Card/Details.aspx?name=Scourge%20of%20Valkas) [(SF)](https://scryfall.com/card/ima/145?utm_source=mtgcardfetcher) [(MC)](http://magiccards.info/query?q=!Scourge%20of%20Valkas)   [Stubborn Denial](https://img.scryfall.com/cards/normal/en/ktk/56.jpg?1517813031) - [(G)](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Card/Details.aspx?name=Stubborn%20Denial) [(SF)](https://scryfall.com/card/ktk/56?utm_source=mtgcardfetcher) [(MC)](http://magiccards.info/query?q=!Stubborn%20Denial)   [Patron of the Vein](https://img.scryfall.com/cards/normal/en/c17/20.jpg?1517813031) - [(G)](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Card/Details.aspx?name=Patron%20of%20the%20Vein) [(SF)](https://scryfall.com/card/c17/20?utm_source=mtgcardfetcher) [(MC)](http://magiccards.info/query?q=!Patron%20of%20the%20Vein)   [Malakir Bloodwitch](https://img.scryfall.com/cards/normal/en/c17/116.jpg?1517813031) - [(G)](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Card/Details.aspx?name=Malakir%20Bloodwitch) [(SF)](https://scryfall.com/card/c17/116?utm_source=mtgcardfetcher) [(MC)](http://magiccards.info/query?q=!Malakir%20Bloodwitch)   [Angel of Sanctions](https://img.scryfall.com/cards/normal/en/akh/1.jpg?1517813031) - [(G)](http://gatherer.wizards.com/Pages/Card/Details.aspx?name=Angel%20of%20Sanctions) [(SF)](https://scryfall.com/card/akh/1?utm_source=mtgcardfetcher) [(MC)](http://magiccards.info/query?q=!Angel%20of%20Sanctions)   ^^^[[cardname]] ^^^or ^^^[[cardname|SET]] ^^^to ^^^call
Gotta love the Nova 5!
Oh wow, what an utterly gross and shameless thing to say to someone as your reason for dumping them. Makes her look so bad. She doesn’t seem too concerned about exposing herself to be a parasite. I would almost feel obligated to send it to future bfs as a warning. Don’t take this personally people get dumped for all different reasons all the time. it’s not that common to find the right person and if it was it wouldn’t be special. Shitty relationships with shitty people gotta end somehow right ?
This story about your friend sounds like complete bullshit.   If this actually happened, why was your friend repeatedly going human in order to get invaded in one of the most frustrating areas in the game? This doesn't sound like a Dark Souls issue it sounds like an issue in your friend's decision making and that the game wasn't for them anyway.
I-i.  ~~D-do I really want to make that? We haven't even decided how they look!~~
IMO, property relationship agreement for your relationship and trust for the property.
do you comprehend what rice cakes are? does that also break your brain? how have you gotten this far in life where you can't comprehend that there are cakes outside of birthday cakes? 
slim fit to xtra large. just know at least coderre wasn’t doug ford. 
Speaking of, it got an anime recently, which was also when the remake was announced.
I hear Melbourne has dope coffee get me some local shit
LOL Im sure they'll get out and leave their info.  
25th anniversary****
The question is, is it easier to get the jeeps in pieces out of the hatch?  I also know very little about restoring old motor vehicles, but if you'd have to take a lot of it apart to get it working, anyway...
Frank ft Kanye &amp; A$AP\*\*\*
Meta
I thought it was just me!! Driving me nuts last night. Glad it's the stupid app and not my phone, my phone's shit enough without the added problem
Not really bothered by any agenda political or otherwise, star wars always had an anti-authoritarian theme with the heroes and maybe not so much in the films but the EU had destroying/reforming the Empire's anti-alien sentiment. As a previous poster said Star Wars has been pretty good for racial/gender diversity without obviously trying to make a point.  I just despair with the direction they took the universe post ROTJ any political agendas are meaningless to me compared to the overall story and character directions.
I know that Oregon has racial issues, but jeeeez man. They should’ve known that not enough people would’ve stood behind this woman had she cried racism. The employee did *nothing* wrong, so you have *nothing* to fear.
Pirate killer is all I need  just imagine the cosmetics the survivors will get from that chapter!
The amount of money they make per week.
1. Cimetidine can be used for warts. 2. If you ask Google Home "What medication for GERD can also be used for warts?" it answers correctly with "Cimetidine..."  Maybe this is common knowledge but felt stupid when I suggested switching to ranitidine \(profit loss on cimetidine\) and MD said they were treating warts.
My land vehicle spawns are ALWAYS hit and miss on the base. He'll even the emergency Pegasus vehicle are strange sometimes.  Edit: HELL not he will...
Mine was the database. Forgot to set up the username for the database. 
Okay as much as everyone loves to ask for this and thinks it would be cool, it is not...  Okay so let me explain, as a bot dev, why this is annoying to deal with.  When a person joins (talking from discord.js library btw), an event is fired off that tells the bot someone joined. The ONLY thing this event has is the member that joined, nothing more. So, in order to track invites like you want to, the bot has to, on loading up or joining your server, fetch ALL the invites, get their usage amounts, then, in your case, assign them to certain user IDs counts, etc etc. Then when someone joins your server the bot must once again fetch all the server invites from your server and then check them against its stored values to see if any of them changed.  This might not be too bad on a small server, but if you want to give out levels based on advertisement, which i highly do not recommend because it can land you in hot water, you are going to have at least 20 or 30 of these things floating around which is 30 invites that the bot dev must store, and then compare off of which is not so much hard as it is a major hassle.  I hope this explains why this thing does not exist on any prominent bots yet. Maybe when discord gives us bot devs and the api library devs the invite a person used to join then we can see more of this stuff working out.  P.S. Because of the nature of promises and api and bla bla bla, sometimes you can get a false positive, eg two people join from different links at around the same time and they both get assigned to the invite the last person joined with, which is another issue.
It really wouldn't... my response included temperature, miles driven, speed, the specific charging station used, charging rate, battery SoC. These are the things I'm asking you to share as well to explain a story that purports #RapidGate goes even beyond what anyone else has ever experienced. You're making an extraordinary claim, when there are other more likely explanations for not achieving 50 kW charging rates, and no details  to rule those explanations out with.
"You get free advertisement for this? Whoops, let us join a bit late, check us out we're a cool team too" unfortunate how the late replies don't sound as honest fan service. Not necessarily calling them out but was it not urgent email in a pile of emails or is it just deciding it's actually worth it to reply after ignoring at first?
Nice car, nice clothes, nice watch, and clothes that fit well and match. 
(Imagine my surprise)
YEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEEAH
So fast 
Can’t get more “wolf-like” than an actual wolf...
The last time I did this, I had a bunch of preschoolers grabbing at my crotch. It was......oddly fulfilling. 
Pretty damn cute. 
Wait, the what effect?
Phantom Thread  It wasn't as powerful as There Will Be Blood, but the depth that Daniel Day Lewis brings to the portrayal of a character when directed by Paul Thomas Anderson remains unparalleled by anything in cinema in my view.  
Dell is private. That's the difference between 'money' and '"Fuck YOU!" money'. "Mikey D" may, also, be the most heavily leveraged man on Earth. His holdings, it's claimed by people not me, are only 20% of his worth.
Also sounds somewhat plausible. Man these my thought posts are giving me some hope 
me too, season four remix before i dive into five
Ahh makes more sense.
Goddamn, seeing Rumble break down and Weidman's dad defending him actually choked me up a bit
Dont be so hard on yourself
She’s doing great! We have 7 healthy pups! 2 brindle, 5 black. She finished delivering around 5:30 and just got up to get a bite and some water. I snuck a quick picture when she got up to eat so I’ll try to post a link! 
LIGHT YEAR  ---  v0.4.3 | This message was posted by a bot. | [FAQ](https://www.reddit.com/r/TranscribersOfReddit/wiki/index) | [Source](https://github.com/GrafeasGroup/tor) | Questions? [Message the mods!](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FTranscribersOfReddit&amp;subject=Bot%20Question&amp;message=)
burn the world
Probably September or October of 2018. Most likely a release date by E3.
hun it’s all bots do u really think vixens ass is gonna get more than a thousand ?? 
Someone on Twitter claimed they had they the info, it was a restock on a lot of recent stuff, nothing crazy. Same stuff that was restocked on Eastbay today
Putin is happy his lapdog is following orders
The meteor
maybe he has is a charity scammer trying to get money from gullible hindus who have never seen or heard of iron man
In that case, I'd advise you to just kill them. Pokemon aren't worth the time to train especially when you can just get higher level Pokes with the better cooking pots and reroll their skills. Unless its a rare Pokemon and you're dealing with dupes. If thats the case, i'd recommend keeping the one with 2 skills, with one skill having 2 upgrade slots. The skills themselves don't matter as you can reroll them later anyways.
nah https://www.buymeacoffee.com/waterfox  http://waterfoxproject.org/
Poorly written laws don't negate  those which aren't poorly written. This is an all or nothing argument, and not how the world works. 
cute tiny bb💕💕
Haven’t seen the article, but I believe it.
That's not how protests are done.  Ive seen them on tv.  I don't see any cars on fire, stores being looted, or people getting it in the nuts with bean bags.
This is from February, the black caucus has softened it's stance since then not ruling out that they could support full legalization in the future. When the time comes to actuallu vote is what matters, and they may very well support it.
Therapy my friend. This feels like you’re conflicted about feeling resentment (totally natural) but dearly love your family and happy to help (also natural). You’ve got tackle the resentment I think so you can enjoy looking after them all which seems genuinely what you like to do!
Have you driven it into a crowd of people yet?
Pompeo is the man 
Mainly just for gaming and regular Web stuff
I also feel pretty awkward when casual friends or co-workers comment on my weight loss. Thankfully it’s all been lighthearted and supportive comments from the pleasant people I’m lucky enough to be surrounded by. But I also pull the quick conversation change.   When someone comments that I’ve lost weight, I say “thanks, I’ve been working at it. Any plans for the weekend?” or something like that. I like to let people know that it’s not a result of illness (which is why I’m careful to rarely comment when I see someone has list weight); I am intentionally trying to lose. But also that I don’t want to talk about details, though I’m happy to chat about something else. 
Bryan... become... a Bludgeon Brother!!  *\*yes yes yes yes\** \- inevitable  crowd reaction though.
🐐🐐🐐🐐
F 
FF7 will have a presence @ E3 so that's not a good indicator of falseness.
The Oladipo trade shows what happens when you trade 'assets' for a star player. Now, LBJ is far better than Paul George, but our assets collectively are/at least perceived better than Oladipo/Sabonis at the time.  Same thing for a Kawhi trade, we can be patient and still improve the team and strike in 2019. 
Yo don’t scare the lad Jesus 
I played it a few times, but that was when I was running a laptop so I was getting that speedy 8fps every game. It was pretty fun! 
Some ninjas dragon slash do energy damage
Stay classy commenters.  https://i.imgur.com/uszIzA4.jpg 
They’re funny as shit though. Weren’t they interviewed on the sidelines at the pro bowl or something?
They’re trying really hard to stay around DC.  FO3 is literally in DC Boston isn’t super far from DC, Boston is also a big American political history epicenter. FO76 is in West Virginia(part of which is very close to DC)/ Virginia(A state with TONS of political history, also DC to the north). And according to lore Vault 76 was considered a DC area vault.   I imagine if we ever get FO in New York it will probably not be NYC since it was totally destroyed. So probably upstate or end up as DLC for FO set in Jersey.   I could see FO 5 being in Philadelphia, but since there is already the Pitt DLC (Pittsburgh) I don’t know that they would go back for a full game in PA.   I’d like to see FO set in south eastern Virginia. Massive military presence in the area. Tons of Gov. type stuff around here. Also Louisiana would be sweet but if they continue choosing political/ big government areas it’ll never happen.
If 609k households tuned in on cable to watch the episode, the number of downloaders has to be in the *millions* I am sure. The way this show is distributed there are fans all over the world who have the choice of either waiting a year to watch a show they are passionate fans of, or downloading the show illegally. Cable is not quite dead but I assume its going to reach a well deserved death in a few years, so its a lousy distribution method. I doubt there is any way to really estimate how many are pirating it though.
They have eternal life. Executing an unarmed host is not a death sentence. Have you forgotten that? 
9 extra base hits in Nimmo's last 10 games. 
Any year before Gav left....
Yeah in my story I'm working on, the dragons are like... the most magical powerful beings. (Like d&amp;d scale ultimate boss... just crazy hard, so you gotta respect them). But the younger ones, like in the art I posted to the other guy, they are... not that smart. After a lot of years of dealing with youngster energy and instinct, they eventually get more docile and able to use magic than just fire, which includes telepathy so they can speak with humans, and even disguising themselves by transforming magic.  In the story I have, the main evil person is like... from this long line of royal dragon slayers, and she decides to change the path of how the kings play by instead forcing the dragons to do what she wants by harsh training and tourture when they're really young.  So... :/ ... I'm like, if she does this, she probably wouldn't be able to talk to them, but communicate like how you would with a horse where you'd hit/poke it a certain way to control and move it. Cuz she'd keep them dumb and not to mention the younger ones don't have enough capacity to think about language. Does this make sense?
I take the pockets out of dresses that I know I’ll never put anything in them. Not as fun as some of the above answers but it gives me a cleaner line which is appreciated. 
Idris is pretty much huge \(yeah I know, \&lt; Javelin \&lt; Bengal \&lt; Kingship \&lt; Retribution\), I suspect the prime big target of Eclipses will be Corvette size \(Polaris, Hammerhead, Hull D\).  Of course you can attack an Idris, but yeah, better bring 5 Eclipses and other stuff.
/r/frugal_jerk 
Hey again, Karen! A veterinarian.
Hi,  I was redirected here. I'm trying to convert vinyl to digital and I need a player. I found a Technics 1200 SL-M3D For sale nearby for $375.00. Would this be a good record player to own? 
Normalizing the "c-word"? My Australianess can't tolerate this affront. Cunt is an integral part of who I am as a person and a human being and an individual.
Somewhere Roman Polak just received a royalty check for that jersey and was really fucking confused. His own parents probably don't own a Polak jersey. You're a fucking beauty.
cool thanks, adding it to he list of builds i need to do.
Living in New Orleans where the roads are horrible and we flood from time to time, I really do factor vehicle height into my next car purchase.  It’s not that I want to go tooling around on a flooded street, it’s just that a few extra inches of ground clearance could save my car from being flooded if I get stuck in a low area during a sudden storm.  I’m cautious so it hasn’t been an issue yet in my low, sporty car, but I’d totally get a wrangler or Subaru outback or something for my next car.  If they still made cool small pickups with tiny cabs I’d consider that but pickups are crazy huge these days.
here's the problem - benzo's are actually too good at what they are designed to do. they don't just mitigate anxiety, they completely fucking remove it from existence.... until, it starts wearing off, and your brain can't help but desire that sensation of being completely care-free, which can't otherwise be created. And so you're left with a choice, live with anxiety, or take the bar, and of course, we'll always want to take the bar.  here's where you are now: you can't function without it, because the anxiety is so overwhelming the thought of going day after day in the agonising state of fear and fireworks in your brain makes you shudder.   here's the problem: the only way to end the addiction is to wean off the benzo's slowly (typically using valium) and endure an extended state of anxiety until you are completely benzo free. And still, your anxiety will be present, but you will no longer be a slave to the xan, and similarly can be proud that you are managing your mental health and moving toward a more sustainable future.  benzo's work like floaties for kids learning to swim. You had been treading water for long enough you decided to put on floaties (inflatable armbands), so you could just float. It was so nice to just float, you left them on for too long that you forgot how to swim. You need to learn to swim again.
&gt;A nice policy for the deluded patriot that thinks America is great enough to solve problems single-handedly; not so good for everyone else who knows you need friends to get things done in the world.  That's the problem with nationalist rhetoric. We're the land of the free! America is the greatest country in the world!  People start to believe that shit and make decisions based on it.
No, but I'm a member of the gay community who doesn't buy into the hysteria. You're also kind of twisting what he said.   He said that sources have come to them now about Bruce, but if they had come to them during the first task force, they could have ended things a lot sooner.  With nobody giving them information, they had to end the task force. His entire point was that they didn't have any evidence connecting anything, so they had to disband the task force.   That's not "blaming the gay community".  That's saying the truth: the police did exactly what they should have with the information they had.  If they had more information, they could have stopped it sooner. His actual quote is  &gt; I've heard a lot of sources say certain things, and had those sources said those things when we had Project Houston, I think there is a very strong potential that the outcome could have been different.   He's talking about the specific sources, not the entire gay community.  
Hoping he has a very minor feature. Testing stinks.
Oof! I hope he recovers quickly, that sounds painful!   I can't imagine surgery involving a fractured hip bone allowing him to keep playing the tournament so quickly tbh, but who knows.   Edit: Also interesting considering they almost lost Mamedyarov at the start because of his dental problem. I guess the hosts are getting ample opportunity to show off their medical system to all the competitors. 
Thank you! This seem like a great pass-time for me! I also really appreciate how professionally run this whole operation seems. Thanks for the opportunity to do some good!
No, it wouldn't. Harmony heals at a rate of 30hp / s. Additionally, Brigitte deals 58.33 damage per second from her primary fire alone (one 35 damage swing every .6 seconds). So while harmony slows the rate brigitte can wear down a target with her primary fire to roughly half, it doesn't prevent her from killing them with it.  With her burst combo she can still dispatch the target fairly easily. 
Well he’s got the assignment. 
It never clicked in my mind that all those settlements you had to build would/could have been more in depth locations. Personally I don't care to build up a base and now I feel cheated! Do you own damn settlement building!
What a waste of perfectly good organs/kibble/human leather cowboy hats.
I wonder at what point rich people start moving their political parties into these areas.  It would be simply \- cheap housing and register them to vote when moving.  Especially if they're politically active.  It's only a matter of time.
they take whatever food they already have off of them for own goals
I don't think the notoriety of the resurrected is the key factor here. Rather, it's that long dead corpses were reanimated and walked to the city. We have multiple accounts of relatively banal events in the gospels, yet no mention of this extraordinary occurrence.  If there is a "residual effect", whereby weird magical things tend to happen in the wake of other weird magical things, then that would have a pretty huge theological impact on the metaphysical reality of the universe.
O
Personally I put myself on here because I wanted to know the way I see myself is justified, and I am correct in disliking my appearance. Also to have outside perspective.
This would make the transition from heavy to engie better.  
GTA Dude: "Ok can you atleast show me where the next hospital is, because I don't want to answer that question."
Burning your house down is a bigger mess than a little baking soda though
can you update the link?
Ah as I like to call it the trifecta 
I agree, I thought it was great. Just spit-ballin' what they might do.
Lol yeah fuck him for being a maladjusted child 
Two points to the heavens for that one!
I work for an online comic book shop, you should check us out, we're great for back issues and our shipping is $5 flat rate for any amount of books. Not to try to sell you on the site because it doesn't really benefit me one way or the other but it sounds like it could help. Feel free to dm if you have any questions Www.Newkadia.Com
I am a great magician! Your clothes are red!
No big deal, trade wars are easy to win amirite?  /s since its required these days.
Theres no price difference between the two, but if u want any selling related achievements then u should use the bin.
also...boycotting the purchase of TF3 isnt going to speed up the process of crossplatform gaming becoming a thing :P
&gt;  manage stress to medium or less  As if I could quit my job without the addition stress my drastic life change would give me.
Do they grow new scales over time like lizard? And if so, will that push the decorative metal scale out of place?
I'd be hesitant doing bleed ROA.  I was gonna do something similar but as a gladiator until I saw they absolutely gutted the base damage and effectiveness.  So if your build was reliant on the bleed to do dmg, might not be sooo good right now.
"Let me show you how it's done."
We have a whole committee. Still, maybe I'll write Tom Wolf a letter to add postal balloting to the voting overhaul which is set to include voting machines with paper ballot backups by 2020.
Prosperity
F
Long ES from POC.  Not getting greedy at inflection points made all the difference for me last night, very profitable day (from ES, J6 &amp; CL, lost money on GC). Going back to old posts to drill it in my head even more. 
And if you’re buying in The Shire, you don’t even need to pay your neighbours for the service. 
Maybe he's pirate king and someone is challenging him?
Thirth down, eh?
Ohhh ok thanks 
Just some ramblings from an idiot for you.  &gt;*"The path cannot be sought—the important thing is just to stop the mind."*  In other words, no seeking, turning within. (Kensho). Realization on the spot of emptiness, the transience of things, non-duality.  To be in playful samadhi. (The "Unborn" of Bankei).  &gt;*"You need to search morning and night until you reach the point where the road of conception comes to an end, whereupon you’ll suddenly spontaneously stop. After this stopping, the racing and seeking mind stops."*  Death (Samadhi).   The racing mind "catches up", if you will, and rests. Unification of mind and body. (Which transitions the thinking from intellectually-based, to intuitive-based, "non-dual" functionality, or actions free from binding "karma"). That's to do non-doing, I believe.  I rather enjoy this, I believe it applies:  &gt;Candragomin:  &gt;&gt;If I apply enthusiasm, excitation occurs, and if I dispense with it, depression arises. When it is so difficult to discover the appropriate level of engagement, what shall I do with my turbulent mind?  &gt;&gt;If I engage with effort, excitation occurs, and if I relax, depression arises. When it is so difficult to practice the middle way, what shall I do with my turbulent mind?
Autism
Haha no worries at all dude I get that it’s not for everyone and I’m not one of those clueless people that just thinks everyone on earth should love watching my videos, so thanks for the honesty!   And thanks for the kind words man I’m glad people are enjoying it! 
Am I missing something?
I'm going to a motorcycle shop this weekend to look
Yep, we have two of these. We feed a mix of two different kinds of food, and it's easier to keep them separate until feeding time. They work great, except for the fact that they changed how they interlock when stacked between the time we bought the first one and the second, so they don't actually lock together like they should. So if you need more than one, buy them at the same time.
Those two for sure, but blood's immortals are already using the slots of the best looking pieces from it...
as long as it enters muscle tissue. doesnt matter  I use 3/4" needle, 25g. 
But would you pay more for lab grown?
Nah, Todos is built up and more expensive now but if you're travel savvy you can find free places to sleep/camp everywhere.
SD |[STREAM ENG Cleveland Cavaliers @ Golden State Warriors ESPN Feed](http://www.emagersport.tk/2018/05/cleveland-cavaliers-golden-state.html) |AD Overlays:1 | Mobile : Yes
I’ll be the beard in the Boy Scout uniform. 
I LOVE the Gits! 
It mean Drake's a pedophile and probly fucks a lot of high schoolers
I think you mean "Buy for WRYYYY now on Steam!"
Looking good! Nice follow thru and feet position as mentioned above. Keep it up, baller!
They look like noodles
I'm not saying anyone is supposed to get it. To me personally it felt pretty decent to get it still.
QuickBooks Enhanced: $45/month + $4/employee  QuickBooks Full Service: $109/month + $4/employee  Gusto: $39/month + $6/employee  ADP: $162.64/month for 10 employees and  $45 + $5.75/employee (so $102.50 for ten employees) to process W-2s and 1099s.  Paychex:  $77/pay period and $60 + $6.25 per employee  to process W-2s and 1099s.   Patriot Payroll Basic: $10/month + $2/employee  Patriot Payroll Full Service: $25/month + $4/employee  APS Payroll: $40 per payroll processed + $2 per employee per item
I wonder how many people did the record dungeons in the old-fashioned low-level way, killing Tyro so that he doesn't gain any XP.
Can you tell me where you've heard this? I am reading [this](https://www.ato.gov.au/uploadedFiles/Content/SPR/downloads/js38724_GN09_Change_to_personal_super_contributions_deductions.pdf) and it says that concessional contributions made in the way I have described in my previous post count toward your concessional contributions cap \($25,000\). This makes sense because you get a tax rebate from making these contributions. Logic would follow then that, when you receive a tax rebate, you have reduced your taxable income. Following that logic, your taxable income might be reduced below $90,000 and the medicare surcharge should not be payable. 
excellent work, which tracker did you use? would you recommend that brand? I am looking to invest in one and up my astro-game
It’s also a local number and not one of Lyft’s relay numbers. I don’t expect you to know that because I blanked it out. 
Wait how do you get those cars
CBJ would be Abramov, Carlsson, then maybe Fortier or even Sherwood before Texier. Texier could get up there though they are still so young.
I noticed this with other topics as well.  "The economy is recovering painfully slow, and that's a good thing"
Largely depends on the environment and time of year,  and if you have a fire as well. If you're in the forest with a bearable climate,  a simple lean to facing a fire will be fine. For five of you,  make multiple built in a semi circle,  with the fire in the middle.  Or,  if you're more interested in fun, look at pictures of a bunch of different shelters until you find one that looks interesting,  and learn to build that. 
I hope he did. I hope he's Kenyan-born as a motherfucker. It would be hilarious.
I think game 4 should include the following:  Pre\-puck drop concert on ice courtesy of the Foo Fighters.  A dynamic pre game show that consists Trump's military parade \(on ice though\) along with hundreds of bald eagles flying through through CapitalOne arena while the National Anthem is played, oh and Dave Chepelle should be involved some how as well, maybe he can be involved in a skit that depicts how the Caps took down Columbus, Pittsburgh and Tampa to make it to the SCF. The possibilities are endless my friends lol.
GachiPls FUME KNIGHT GachiPls forsenSWA GachiPls OMEGALUL
These bodies ain't loyal.
I get it, you’re a troll.
I'm worried that you'll have to fall into a pattern of "use gears, spend 30 seconds standing around waiting for them to recharge, rinse, repeat"... plus the speed gear actually seems to slow down Megaman in addition to slowing down enemies and stage hazards, yuck!
So lovely 
The next exxxtra small girl star 
That will always be my favorite gif
Don't curse dude like that cmon now!
No Chris for Vanuatu?
Matts matted in. We used to have those :(
Is that on the side of Roswell hardware? 
How does that work? Why did it get delayed by a whole week?
This is an aggressively worded comment. Meta...
no u
The last round of mailers were in March, nobody knows if when Amex will start sending them out again.
Also 10 dpo. The struggle to test is so real. I'm trying to wait this cycle for AF to be late before I actually test. 
Absolutely beautiful! 
This should be put on posters everywhere.
No one makes bad moonshine and sells it these days. 
Good on them. So many women are too rough on themselves about their bodies. 
Never draft on need. You always take the top available talent in the draft (barring contract negotiation shenanigans).   Bart has been heavily linked to the Giants at #2 via various media outlets, so I don’t know why you say this pick is going against the current narrative (although pitchers like Winn have also been connected, as expected). 
made my own using snipping tool on practice passages. Also use anki
Good short term solution yeah, but I don’t think this guy is hooking up with any chicks over Fortnite... 
Same, blew 60 quartz on this banner with some minor hope of boobie monk but mostly for the CE's to cut down on the grind. Should have 220 for swimsuits by then and then it's the ishtar/Merlin long game for me
Trump is an angry, lonely asshole with no real friends, and he’s trying to remake America in his image. 
Get to meet yeezus in heaven tho
Also helpful if you have someone take a video when the seamstress shows you how to do it.
Mini gallery is now submitted as a post on this sub! Check out my latest post \^\_\^
AUTOMAKERS ARE MAKING CAR OWNERSHIP OPTIONAL  https://www.wired.com/story/automakers-subscription-car-ownership-optional/
HAHAHA I meant logic (damn you autocorrector!)
Top tree for boss dps. Hammers go boom. It doesn’t really matter what you use since destiny is so flat with everything from weapons to armor, it’s mostly about regen on grenades and abilities. The Titan chest exotic is pretty much the go to for pve. 
or just send them to me and we can exchange picks 
He's gunning for president
I don't remember it being stated that Kirin was an extension of Chidori. But I agree
I don’t need therapy
Hi, lolsyjn, thanks for your submission to /r/madlads! Unfortunately, your submission has been removed for the following reason(s):  Rule 2) Your post is a still image that isn't a screenshot of social media.  ***REMINDER***: We do ***not*** punish for posts that break rules. If you feel that it has been removed in error, please [message us](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Fmadlads) so that we may review it.
Go somehwere, get a diagnosis, and then look up how to fix it on YouTube. I never realized how easy some repairs are. I replaced the cabin air filter in my Honda pilot using YouTube and once I get my next paycheck I'll be replacing the blower motor. If the fix is really complicated fine but most times it's not and you can get a free diagnosis of issues at most mechanics so you know for sure what's going on.
Your post has been removed, you want r/whatsthisbug.
Clap
Everyone go show some love on twitter to our new gears player solurs.
The problem if your a playing blind you sometimes don't know who supposed to be the final boss. 
The main writers are Glenn Howerton, Rob McElhenney, Charlie Day and David Hornsby. There are others that have come and gone, but the core writing staff has remained the same throughout the entire series, so the comedic style has remained consistent.  I don't see IASIP as some kind of politically minded comedy akin to south park. They don't need to be trying to educate their audience on why black face is stupid, because that bit relies on the audience already having that understanding in order to to be funny.  There's no pivotal moment where the characters realize what they're doing is wrong. In fact the characters basically never learn any lessons, so if anything you could argue that it's sending the message that you can do those things without repercussions, even though that also would be a stretch because at the end of the day it's just a comedy show.  I do see where you're coming from, but I don't think it's likely enough to be true.
Usually people from Hong Kong and Taiwan don't know pinyin. They use different kind of keyboard while typing.
If only I had chest hair
annual event. They try to catch the wheel of cheese rolling down the hill. no one succeeds 
That’s right, because if I stay away from it the whole industry will die. Why bother doing R&amp;D to improve the industry and lesson its impact when all I have to do is avoid it to resolve the issue.
Sharon Rogers is S-tier* not A-tier. My favorite part of Shadowlands is using her to solo both waves of floor 29 in under 15 seconds each! There's a reason everyone and their mom has her at T2.  That being said, she's also the best T1 character in the game besides Nova and Blue marvel. So go ahead and T2 hulk, having a diverse roster is especially useful when starting out.
SD | [Cleveland Cavaliers Vs Golden State Warriors ES ESPN](http://www.soccerjumbotv2.me/2/ch-1.html) | NSFW: Yes | MISR: 512kbps | Clicks: 4 | Mobile : No
r/ghostnipples 
Seems like he’s never experienced a spider in the dunny
Woman boss! Your boss is not a child. 
H Orange Apex.  Playmaker Exotic Cobalt Sterns.   W  striker chameleon 
AHHHHH YEAHHHHH!!!!!!
I sure wouldn't expect that truck to be a cop. Nice truck. 
Well to be fair it's our front page 
No worries. But to be clear I didn't make it, I just remembered it existed. Have fun.
Actually opened an Elite trainer box.
Give this man a meme linguistics diploma. 
Think I’ll have a steak with blue cheese for dinner.  Edit: suck it vegans. Agriculture is 10% of greenhouse gas contribution. I’ll keep my steak, try to drive less and use less electricity.  https://rctom.hbs.org/wp-content/uploads/sites/4/2017/11/GHG.png
The hope is that the feeling will come back in the coming months, but anything I don't have back by 6 months is likely permanent.   I'm only 9 days out, so I'm trying to be patient. But leaky butthole is damn miserable. Especially since it happens worse when I'm on the toilet, and now they've taken the catheter out and I have to void my bladder every 2-3 hours like clockwork since I can't feel the need to urinate. 
Out of all the iOS games I play, this one is the most sensitive about connection. During my gameplay I usually encounter it 3 or 4x (not just since the update). And it kicks me completely out about 50% of the time. Not sure what the deal is. 
Couplr more thIngs I just thought of: hydraulic tailgate stays on subaru hatchbacks are garbage and I've replaced them like 4 times under warranty and gave up after that. Will that be an issue?  If I remove unecessary stock equipment like fog lights that have given me more issues than they solve, will that be an issue?
Your post has been removed. Due to the amount of people posting the daily shop, including new items, we are allowing the stormshieldonebot to post the list of daily items, including a quality screenshot of the store daily from yourboytay so the sub does not get flooded with shop sale posts. Thank you for your understanding. *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/FortNiteBR) if you have any questions or concerns.*
-
Where I was when Michael j. Fox announced he had Parkinson's. Like, the most vivid memory of my childhood is that. 
I do like Andromeda's main menu music.  It wasn't even a flawless killstreak, you died and got ressed.  Sucks that you get kicked and banned just for playing really well.
https://youtu.be/hMtjGfr0tYs This right here is proof positive why the lights on my tree only stay on while were in the living room. Those things go up too damn fast. 2.5 minutes most likely won't get you out in time depending on your home's layout.
Little kids chanting "Bran-don Nim-mo" at Citi Field warms my cold heart.
It depends on the game. Some games work great high, some need to have a low camera. 
She's super cute! Mine is also a rescue, but I think he's pure springer spaniel.
Also, they used to post on r/incels.
Y U SAY DIS?
Dude, Lana is one thirsty ass chick. She's always showing off a lot of her body. I would complain if I was Rusev, but I'm not. So...it's all okay with me.
Hes banned off youtube once again which means he will leech off ice in Austin, whom he called a racist a couple of days ago. 
Holy shit.
Part of the ARG. This post is by "Emily" - a computer or something.
Under the eyes of the law, yes, but there is no imperative to do the same in the court of public opinion, nor does it make sense to hold things to that standard.
He's screening the lecturer.
Thats not even really what guro is. Its pretty light for guro standards, with it being 8-bit and all. Guro is usually significantly more graphic.
He is not getting sleep that's how fast muller is working He can't finish though because trump keeps breaking the law
he probably was talking about Japanese restaurants... right?
People have always wanted to be able to enjoy Bethesda games with a friend, I don't see why everyone is so hysterical over them trying something new.
Would you ever get involved in specialized porn (example: "midget porn") if you were offered the right kind of money? Do you find that kind of thing dehumanizing?
He's young with unlimited potential... he posted 20ppg this season, imagine what Spo can do to him. I've wanted Miami to trade for him last deadline but we got Dwade so its all gucci lol
Gonna be a no from me dawg
So what is the punishment for this kind of thing? Can we expect prison for anyone or will it just be a fine that is a fraction of what they make in a day?
Sorry I meant to say, put a return in a variable [like this. ](https://i.imgur.com/oS2wl4r.png)
Lol yeah I'm sure THAT is why and nothing to do with her not wanting to relinquish her grasp on all of Europe.
I swear to god, when will necro get a set that doesn't look awful?
Sorry dude did you respond to last message because I saw it for a second but now I don’t.
&gt;This thread's top-level comments should ONLY be proposed questions to submit for the AMA.  REEEEE NOT A QUESTION
I agree with you. I've known lesbians from conservative cultures who were married off to men at a young age and didn't get any say in the matter \- they didn't even have the option to not get married, let alone come out as a lesbian. Coming out, getting away from family etc. only happened once they were older and had the means/opportunity to do so. That's perhaps the most extreme example of compulsory heterosexuality in action, but it's in operation in other forms in our supposedly free and democratic societies. It's troubling to blame lesbians for their own oppression within patriarchy, I don't see how that's helpful.
2H is mostly used at end game, at your level you should definitely use whatever you like the best. There are some skills exclusive to each weapon type so try them out. Generally speaking however, 2H is preferred. At least in Magic and Melee.   There could be some debate for Dual Wield ranged, but again, these are things you don't need to be thinking about yet. Pick your favourite. Have fun!
&gt;I saw a video today suggesting that humans are not “natural meat eaters”. I understand his point, but my natural next question is what if we were?  Would vegans then be okay with consuming meat? You mean a species that must have meat or will suffer a real health condition?   If humans did, I dont see you could have veganism at all.  &gt;How do vegans feel about animals that are “natural meat eaters”?  Snakes and lions are supposed to eat meat.  That's not immoral or wrong.   &gt; &gt;I can only conclude that it is animal cruelty alone that is actually the issue. My question then would be, if animals were not treated cruelly, would vegans be okay with eating meat?  There's no way to obtain meat without causing animals suffering and death.  Unless you want to eat roadkill that you find?
thats a cool resource for those of us in the unpaid podcasting world 
That 38 lbs lost has made such a difference!  Them hair gains too.  😮
As long as it doesn't reset me back a tier, I will choose a random squad to lose the battle
Lots of good stuff, very informative. Inputs are in the video.
Y’all fools kill me. I know y’all are Kanye stans and shit but to say all this about drake is just complete bias. This album, like all his others, will be solid full of good songs. And wether ya like it or not, it’s gonna rule the charts, and probably outsell Kanye. Sorry to inform you 
Pinpoint accuracy my behind. I would say more than half the time I get a request, I’m two houses past the box it’s asking for.  
Yeah, you find out about it in her FTEs. Seems she’s part of this super famous dancing family, and once her talent was apparent, she was taken away from her parents to be raised by her very strict grandmother. Hiyoko deeply misses her parents, especially her father, who she was very close to, and she believes is the only person who cared about her rather than her talent.  She grew up without a real family, and was bullied by the other dancers, who plagued her with pranks ranging from pins in her shoes to trying to drop stage lights on her. That’s why she gloms onto Mahiru so hard, as a surrogate mother/big sister. If Hajime gets close enough to her to get her to open up while setting appropriate boundaries, she bonds with him as a father figure.
**HD** | ESPN | [CAVALIERS @ WARRIORS](http://www.losjuanaticos.com) | NO ADS | Mobile: YES
All media.  And yes it is an issue that the media doesn't represent the actual political demographics of the country.
He’s trying to isolate you. “Possibility” to visit friends who live where you are now. “Invite them” means friends he approves of and on his turf where he can supervise. He’s trying to force you out of a life you’ve worked hard for. Parents have friends. They get sitters and do things with their friends. He’s a lot older than you and has a pattern of jumping the gun. You will regret letting him get you off your turf and onto his.
u/stabbot
[As an American right now. ](https://giphy.com/gifs/morgan-freeman-NEy3KrpDqr1ug)
Mmmmm
Hello /u/other_andy! Unfortunately, your post has been removed. To protect the subreddit from spam, we no longer allow new/inactive users to make submissions, you need to build up some link and comment karma and history. In the mean time, please be sure to familiarize yourself with our sidebar rules:  &gt;/r/dankmemes/about/rules &gt;r/dankmemes/about/sidebar  We ask you to participate in the comment sections of our subreddit to build up the karma you need to post here and to learn the rules and standards of our community, then you won't be affected by this spam filter. Spend some time getting to know /r/dankmemes and then you'll be welcome to make submissions.   Thanks for understanding!  #NOTE: Our karma threshold has been raised recently. **Do not message us asking how many points you need.** Or how old your account must be. We will not tell you. In fact we may mute you. You do not need many points. Just get out there and make some more comments and you'll be all good in no time.  #REPEAT: DO NOT MESSAGE US ABOUT THIS. JUST MAKE MORE COMMENTS.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/dankmemes) if you have any questions or concerns.*
That is an illogical and asinine premise.  Should men, falsely accusing a woman of rape, be charged as a sex offender?  Should someone who robs a bank be charged [using a gun as a weapon] with murder?  Law must be fair and just and hold true.  There already exist laws and penalties for libel, slander and making false reports. Sometimes it is best to remain quiet and thought of as a fool, than to open you mouth and remove all doubt.  
the Polanski strategy 
I used to live by the beach outside a state park. Just inside the park there is a dirt road that leads up to a fishing beach. That's my favorite place in the world. No matter how crazy it is outside with traffic and people rushing around to get to their vacation, this hidden little beach is always nice and peaceful.
Have water and detergent (such as Bio-Pac) that is good for greywatering plants. Have tubs. Tread with feet in detergent, transfer to tub and drain, add clear water, rinse several times.
I don’t think being better than Jordan has to do with which teams he beats in the finals personally. 
Tactical EDC gear bro, I might get caught in a spot where I need my flashlights, ka-bar, three lighters, multitool, and tactical wraparound sunglasses, bro.
I mean we know 45 has a long history of fucking over contractors 
Just try it
Thanks! I appreciate all the thoughts. 
I have a 2013 v, when the engine kicks on, I can actually feel it slightly.   As for the brakes, I think that the car doesn't try to creep forward when the brakes are on , like a normal car would\- so the shudder may be the car starting to creep. Just a guess.   BTW, I'm jealous of the low miles! My v has 111K miles on it... but I absolutely had to have the storage capacity of the v, so my options were a bit limited. According to the previous owner, and the maintenance records, it's been 100&amp;#37; problem free up to this point. Hooray for Toyota quality.   One thing you should know as a new owner\- Toyota does not include transmission fluid changes in the maintenance schedule\- they claim it is a permanent lube. Many Prius owners agree that it actually should be changed. I think 60K is a good time. It's not too expensive, about $100 including parts and labor. I had mine changed out at 100k\-ish, the old stuff was murky\- you could not see through it, so I had the drain and fill done twice.
Cause of that chick who revoked consent after the fact? That was pretty fucked it. 
I hope LeBron gives him permission to loosen up, up there. Ty deserves it
two trains carrying dumpster fires on a collision course leave Milwaukee and St. Louis at the same time. The train leaving Milwaukee leaves at a constant speed of 75 mph carrying 8,000 tons; while the train leaving St. Louis leaves with a constant force of 7.50×10^5 N  How much did I laugh when I heard this news?
So all you can do is to copy and paste what I write. If this is not a display of poor reasoning skills I don't know what is.
That poor girl, me as a first date. That's gotta suck.
It's been going on for years and nobody cares.  It has been reported, the store management doesn't care so long as they get sales and while it was reported up the chain and they sent out signs forbidding it, it still happens.  Nothing is being stolen, everything is sold at retail, not at employee discount, so they really have nothing to complain about.
The thought of it makes me cringe so hard it practically hurts. Absolutely not. I'd pierce other parts down there, but stay well away from the clit.
I'm in love 😍😍😍
People ruin everything. The first sellers on the silk road didn't want to invest or get rich quick, they just wanted to participate in the black market without being shot, robbed, or arrested.
Slim and perfect
The Constitution isn't. 
LETS GO WARRIORSSSSS!!!!!
I loved that Trump tweet! Thank you. Also, fuck Shapiro.
point a gun at him and he will shit them faster than you can say "dumbfuck pedo"
Also, if you need another starter (or 3), Saberhagen, Sutton, and Morris are easy to get and are all solid. 
It kills me even more with the RNG as well with guns. A few games straight last night, I would land in a house with just pistols or grenades or an AR if I am lucky; and end up getting shotgunned soon after. I was getting super titled last night, lol.
Lol yep, a lot of meds don't do very well in heat, especially bh meds. So, it's a game of doing the best you can, and picking something that will do good enough. 
We keep spreadsheets with actual measures and send them around to each other
wah.  If you don't want to be disappointed wait until the day the patch actually gets implemented before reviewing the information.  They have every right to make balance changes right up to the last second.  Also the title of this is grossly misleading.
Heelys
Post something on Craigslist. Someone might bite if Petco cannot help. 
Tu parles d'un mode survie, il a tiré dans le dos de mecs qui s'enfuyait, c'était de la vengeance, le mec voulait du sang, il était pas en train de se défendre.
Bill Burr as a wrestling manager. Book it.
Long motorcycle ride.
If it doesn't have any kind of sugary mixers in then sure. Just swish it around really well.
xd
They're both fairly stubborn, but that's good for them. Stubborn and badly-intentioned people are the worst sort of combo, but stubborn and good-intentioned people work fine - if your heart's in the right place, it turns out well. Any kind of stubborn person and a less stubborn person, by comparison, tends to work out less favorable because the less stubborn tends to be more dominated and unhappy while the stubborn partner tends to not even realize it. Innes and L'arachel are both stubborn and good-hearted, so I feel confident that a relationship of theirs would turn out quite well. 
would it be good for minerals?
Faiiiyaaa faiyyaaa faiiyaaaaaaaa   I love it.. :)
